Off Tanzania, Serene Mafia Island Brendan Spiegel for The New York Times
- (Old) Robert , Worcester UK, 30/3/2012 21:44
promising one last golden moment,
The results of its own consumer research played a big role in management formulating its green economy lending and investment and community-focused environmental initiatives. “Our research shows more than 80 percent of our consumers think environmental issues are important,” said Mary Wenzel, Wells Fargo’s director of Environmental Affairs.
“In order for you to qualify for a job as a journalist at News International, we require you to have a Loreal rating of 1/500.”
Apparently her feet had grown alot since Track Club last spring!
There are no cons for me on this product. It has a nice clean scent. While I'M washing my face I can feel the product working and cleansing my skin well. You can wet your face first then apply the cleanser or just pump the cleanser into your palm of your hand then apply. Either way works.
And, as Jeremiah Savile penned in his paean to the monarchy in 1697, we sing “Here’s a Health Unto His Majesty, with a fal-lal- lah-la-la lah lah“
So next time you're out in the garden try to think small things create big problems. Look around and ask yourself is there anything in your garden that could cause a problem to wildlife. For example an empty flower pot can be a death trap for a fledging if it becomes trapped and cannot escape. Also when out and about if you see an elastic band, hair band or one of the plastic can holders please pick it up, pop in your pocket and pop into the bin (once you've cut it up).
Will there be a moment for me to shine?
The generic term “foreclosure filing” is used to group all types of foreclosure activity into a single reading. It includes default notices, scheduled auctions, and bank repossessions.
mystery ‘hidden’ like a black box at the heart of the One or of God, actually at the heart of the Logos, but a secret that remains like a secret that does not alter its ‘formal’ revelation because it is already revealed: a revealed-without-revelation, a secret (of) the One already given by the World,
Level 6: MP Cost: 8, Damage: 270%, Attacks up to 5 enemies.
I picked the pain
Today I've simply steamed it and then layered it in a delicious open faced sandwich for two. Layered on a crisp ciabatta roll, which has been spread with some pesto mayonnaise, along with some ham, sliced tomatoes and lotsa cheese, this went down a real treat.
November: Song Hae-seong (송해성)
As it turns out, my co-workers were actually more focused on one of their cars having been vandalized and broken into. (Have you heard about this rash of car vandalisms that some assholes are perpetrating around Austin? They shoot out the back windows of cars with BB guns. Most aren't robbed, but my co-worker's was. Pig fuckers.) So, I was able to extricate myself from the situation fairly easily there, and to limp to my car in peace, blood clearly oozing from my knee underneath my pantleg.*
We have become used to the public health community and the anti-tobacco lobby groups churning out made-to-measure studies to suit their objectives.
I can guarantee you, or most of you, I guarantee that I have more debt than all of you. With 6 kids, I still pay off my student loans. I still pay my mortgage. I drive a used minivan. If you think I’m living high on the hog, I’ve got one paycheck. So I struggle to meet my bills right now. Would it be easier for me if I get more paychecks? Maybe, but at this point I’m not living high on the hog.
The case is the latest involving men of predominantly Asian origin picking up young girls for sex.
My decision was made before I even reached the table. A half pint glass for Hardknott Dave would be sufficient, after all it was a beer festival. He wouldn't need to drink by the pint as there were already too many beers for him to chose from.
Wednesday (1.26.2011) - Sausage/Cheese/Egg/Pepper/Onion breakfast tacos
For hanging out with friends:
How in the hell is he supposed to go on now? He keeps asking himself that. But there’s never an answer. Just a gnawing guilt in his gut and the gaping, empty hole where his heart used to be.
There are barely any surprises here whatsoever, and even though I don’t need to see something new or original in every movie I check out, I would still like to see some surprises with this story. However, I barely got any of that and plenty of it just feels like a bunch of bad TV-movie clichés Actually, that’s what bothered me the most about this flick because even though they definitely do have genuinely funny moments here, they are all out-numbered by all of the other times that this movie wants to show us how funny and goofy old people can be. Better yet, how funny and goofy old, BRITISH people can be. Doesn’t work and rather than actually doing something new with its source material, the film just throws us down over-used jokes like old people using Viagra. Really!??! Come on!
This blog is full of all kinds of creations and ideas that my crazy head comes up with.
Perhaps I should, I could – and yet
Me: The ONE strong female character was bludgeoned to death with a giant, white marble penis! If that doesn't show his opinion about women, I don't know what does!
There were several show-stopping moments in this show, but LaVette’s version of George Harrison’s “Isn’t It a Pity” was astonishing. While George’s words are deep and reflective, his arrangement is rather lush, somber yet beautiful – an arrangement that dulls the edge of the lyrics a bit. So, LaVette and her band took those very same words and slowed them down, holding them up like a water snake for us to really get a load of the power they held. Most of the time, she barely did more than speak the words but it was her rasp and her slow, knowing voice of pain that made them so powerful. A performance like that knocks an audience right on its ear with the emotions that such immediacy can create. Here, as in most of the other songs, the words took on several new magnitudes of sharpness when LaVette sang them:
don’t kick the can
It is exactly from this type of captivity that the Lord has come to deliver us.
on his back full of sweet annie....
I made up for my sins of "no beer with dinner" by playing darts and drinking a healthy amount of 512 Bruin Brown ale they had on cask hand pump at good ol' Gingerman. This place was the polar opposite of 6th street bars. Lots of pea coats and tame beer love. Not going to see much vomit on the side of the road. We actually managed to see some stars, and used an Android app to find all the constellations.
This set has plenty of inserts - judging by the odds stated on the box, we should expect:
itch
Some of you know that I was in the Army for a little less than eight years. But you might not suspect how good I was at some of the Army things I had to do. I was an expert marksman with a rifle, pistol, and grenade (I know, you're thinking "how hard is it to be an expert at a weapon that destroys anything within a five yard radius"). I was really great at setting up defensive fighting positions. And, with all due humility and candor, I was just fabulous at land navigation. You could plunk me down in the middle of a forest or jungle somewhere, in an area completely unfamiliar to me, and with a compass and a map I could get just about anywhere I wanted to. I could use the local terrain, calculate the declinations, and understand the subtleties of contour maps to interpret exactly where I was and plot out the safest and quickest route to my destination.
I want my thoughts to disappear but they won’t, and I won’t do anything to make them vanish. I remember when he said that “we both went into this relationship knowing it wouldn’t last forever.” That was at the beginning of it. In the middle, we did want it to last forever, but honestly, it never was going to last forever, and I never knew that I would have shared everything with him. I sincerely wish it could have been forever. I really wish it could have been longer, at least make happier memories. It’s really sad. I’m not ready to give back these things. I feel so, so light yet heavy. The necklace is off, and has been off and I miss it… I want it back on, but I won’t put it on.
Another kind of silence I found, however, often characterizes my relationship with God and with others. So many voices and distractions vie for my attention, and out of fear of not being met, I frequently settle for little communication with my Father and Friend. He is bringing to death this stifling, isolating silence. Deep fear of rejection and shame demand my allegiance, and because of them I seldom communicate with people as deeply as I could about relational dynamics, about my heart and theirs. Instead, the gray, silent areas breed fear, distance and assumption, and I am often tormented here. God is putting this silence to death as well, and inviting me into conversation.
Get better? Or is the earth just waiting? Am I always stuck in that place called
WP 4/26
So now it is 2012, I moved back to Illinois from Virginia. A job was promised to me but would find out the company lied and will not answer calls or emails.
3. I finally have a warm place to raise bread, culture yogurt, or start sourdough!
Doctor: “Wow, you are growing up so fast.” (looks in my ear) “Are you going to college?”
As her hands rise the wind caresses her hair past her finger tips..
Hi everybody! I hope that you loved this sketch as much as I did. For a clean and simple card, I used a lot of product on this, like 4 stamp sets, 2 impression plates, 2 die-cuts, and 7 ink colors! They say the definition of clean and simple is a lot of white space. That is not true. You can still make a beautiful clean and simple card using other colors and a focal point. This card happens to have 2, but that's what the sketch called for, and I even left out a layer per the sketch. It was really hard for me to photograph the Fine Linen so I hope that you can see beyond that. The base of the card has dry embossing on it as well as the flowers. I think it just adds a certain elegant element to the card and I hope that you do too. I really love learning how to and creating my own designer paper with stamps.
I'll spare you the gory details, but let's just say it was a sketchy crowd that night
...and a great big thank you for all your wonderful and encouraging comments on my last painting!
1 cures
In fact, the last time I consistently skied was when I was in middle school, and to be honest, that was more about trying to sit next to a cute boy on the bus ride and also flirting and eating french fries in the cafe.
My Vagabond died on me this afternoon.
Cassandra Parkin (UK) – New World Fairy Tales
I let ‘em see me put fresh water in their bowls - before just opening the door to the little yard and turning ‘em out. If they want their food - they can walk their happy asses up to inside the coop and find it.
They are watching, though. All over the country, all these Saudis who rarely watch or read the news and their only interests in doing so are for more local social openness or conservativeness (depending on their background), are now carefully observing what’s going on in neighboring countries. Saudis who didn’t know what the channel number for AlJazeera News was on their receivers now have it saved on their favorites list. University and high school students are now watching the news and social media feeds in their study breaks instead of a rerun of Friends. It’s a new atmosphere. The thing lacking is analysis or a discussion on what it means for us.
I totally skipped April. For good reason. It sucked. I had such high hopes for March - I was going to lose 10 pounds plus a smidge to be finally under 300 pounds. That's a lot for one month, but I was going to do it.
Shakatak ~ Walk The Walk ~ Polydor ~ 1988
Many Williamsburg newsies refused to sell the Times, even defying orders of older, more compliant newsboys. Wagons filled with papers were continually attacked on their way south. Any regular newsboy caught selling the Times was set upon by other boys, often roving bands "backed by a number of roughs." The Daily Eagle reports of some young newsies hiding newspapers in their jackets, selling them to customers in secret, for fear of reprisal.
To make kimchee filling, in a blender puree pear, onion, garlic, ginger, rice and 1/2 cup seafood stock until smooth. Add the fresh chilies and pulse 2-3 times. You should have some small pieces of chilies visible.
Kailey
PA: It won’t kill you, my child. I promise. Eat it.
Here are the instructions. I made A LOT of mistakes along the way, and burned my fingers a few times. Dollar items don't give great instructions. So hopefully if you make them too, then you can learn from my mistakes ;) I did the ghost first, Frankenstein 2nd, and witch 3rd, so I took pics of the last one I did. Also, I don't know if using a glue gun was the best idea for this.
(7) Zacheriah Smith Jr.
So I just had to poke in a mermaid.
The feathered glory from her loosening thighs?
Remove the potatoes from the steamer. I just take the basket, lift it, and set it in a clean sink for a minute or two. They will be rather flaky at this point, not waterlogged. Then I remove the potatoes from the steamer and put them through a potato ricer
The top five things her patients wished for at the end of their lives were:
—-How do you view aging?
I haven’t yet heard from Rachel but am sure will in the next day or two. Until I do I’m off to see what I can come up with and find for the perfect 12 days of Christmas gifts. I’m excited.
28. Lake View
She turned up her nose a bit, which didn’t necessarily surprise me. People are funny about “used” or “second-hand,” maybe even more so when it comes to babies. When T was born, there were only a few things that my husband and I agreed we needed to get brand new: A crib and mattress and a car seat. I registered for new sheets and towels since I wanted organic cotton, and we received them as gifts. We were flexible on everything else; most of the clothes my little guy wears come from friends or the thrift store, as do his toys. I’ve gotten so good at this that I have a head start on keeping this kid in clothes and shoes until he hits kindergarten, if not longer.
( Hopefully! ) Soon we'll have a home and I can put some of these ideas into action. Until then, keep up with my pintrest to see just where my head is at! Check out my pintrest to see the original sources to the above images, and what else I've been pinning lately!
After you see these pictures, you may be thinking, "OH! That is so exciting! I can already see her baby bump!" Nope. Those are just unflattering ruffles, people. WHITNEY is the only pregnant one on this blog.
Of course, with NBC in the state they are currently in, it’s quite possible they have some big reality show they are developing on the DL ready to spring on their schedule when they announce it in a few weeks. NBC has many holes to fill, and I feel far less confident about what they’re likely to do than any other network. Should be interesting.
Better Health Through Better Living
The October 2010 kits are ready and will be featuring GIRL POWER for the month of October. Sneak peeks will start from today ;).
Sailing in Skjálfandi from Húsavík is the best way to watch as many whales and dolphins as possible. The “Haukur” is a very beautiful 20 tons schooner of “North Sailing” built in Reykjavík in 1973. We could see Humpback Whales and White Beaked Dolphins.
Oh no, this book is awesome! It’s so good, that I really can’t review it. I know for a fact, that I would start giving things away. Therefore, read a preview from Amazon.com, check out her blog, hell, find the book elsewhere. IT IS THAT GOOD! What am I going to read next? I’m taking a short break from Amanda Hocking, I’m going for a different read right now.
The questions now are: will the book/author be promoted by the major high street booksellers, by supermarkets, is the ‘the hook’ good enough? Windows of opportunity flung open initially in the high street get slammed shut in the blink of an eye if a book doesn’t achieve early recognition – no time for its readership to grow. Survival of books (publication, then maintenance in print) is skewed by raw sales results.
Dorothy Flynn (Con) 323
First let me tell you a little about my last two days. Monday night I went out and had Thai food for dinner. I drank a cocktail, and later I ate some chocolate and drank some wine. Mind you, these days I don't eat the delicious German milk chocolate anymore. I eat dark, organic, fair trade chocolate.
The Opposition also pressed the PM to answer questions about activities at the Diplomatic Centre with The Keith describing it as as a den of iniquity, as well as pointing out that the helicopter trips cost the public purse $3000 per ride.
EOTR often talks about Johnny Cash on her blog. I have never been a country music fan. I hate to say this about myself but I have been very close-minded about it. When I was younger, I just didn't think it was very cool! But since EOTR, whose opinion I respect, recommends him so highly, I've finally started listening. And I watched I Walk the Line the other night as well. And I have become transfixed! Not just with him, but with that entire era. I sat and watched videos last night. Hank Williams, Loretta Lynn, Jerry Lee Louis, Elvis and Patsy Cline. What have I been missing out on all of these years because of my small mind?
A burst of dazzling brightness sparkled from the tunnel’s wall. Mellie glanced around and noticed a long, winding stairwell leading down into the ground.
This kind of happiness should be bottled so it can be taken on a bad day. It’s a hard-fought win, and I can’t think of anyone more deserving than this team, and these fans. And I can’t think of a better captain to lead this team to victory than Iker Casillas, the best goalkeeper in the world.
And Yanked it with a Mighty Grip,
Have you ever used heat transfers with graphics? I've been doing it for years...long before there was ever a Silhouette machine! And speaking of Silhouette, I treated myself with a little surcie by purchasing one of these babies when they went on sale this summer! I am so excited about learning about this machine and finding some good projects. If anyone has ideas they would like to pass on, please send me the link!
I don't know where this holiday season went - or this entire year for that matter - I just know that it happened much too quickly. We spent a quiet Christmas at home, much needed after the last minute rush of orders and post office runs, gift wrapping, tree decorating, and cookie baking. We're going out to dinner with friends tonight with drinks and gift exchange at our house beforehand. A nice way to finish out the year. We stopped going out on New Year's Eve years ago—honestly I'd rather sleep :)
I am so proud of the things you have done this past year. I know a lot of it is in this blog already. These are some of the things that have made me proud and have impressed me about you:
Constitution was carved in good faith
Clearly, the Coens were playfully thumbing their noses at Hoberman and Rosenbaum and this is further reinforced in the faux scholarly introduction to the film’s screenplay, which claims that it won the 1998 Kochba Award, “honouring achievement in the arts that defy racial and religious stereotyping and promote appreciation for the multiplicity of man.” Yeah … right. Furthermore, the unidentified writer (probably the Coens) goes on to explain the nature of humor with a hilariously in-depth analysis of what makes The Three Stooges funny and thereby making the point that if you have to explain why something is funny to someone else then they’ll never get it. So, are the Coens saying that critics like Hoberman and Rosenbaum don’t “get” their films?
Sierra Nevada Weizenbock
Idaho due to an outcry and groups of women silently protesting but carrying signs like the one to the left. Yes indeed, women are watching.
It was fun wandering around. By the end of the day Saturday the square was overcome with the smells of HONK!: sweat, multiple varieties of body odor, pot. And then Sunday was the great parade when the bands joined by various groups, march down Mass Ave from Davis Square in Somerville to Harvard Square in Cambridge. You see policemen, Mayors, cross-dressers, people on stilts, people-wheels (you know, like a hamster-wheel but with people instead of hamsters). You see weird, you see crazy, but it is all fun and it is all good. HONK! is just another thing that make me love my neighborhood.
Please take our showCASe banner from our page at the top to display on your sidebar
First I went to best buy to see if they had any that appealed to me but they were all either closed-ear or cheap as HELL. Next I phoned some store in the mall then drove down there but they didn't have anything good either. By the way I think I may have conquered anxiety because I haven't been to a busy place like the mall since I was a little girl and I thought it would scare me but it was no big deal. I remember at one point even the thought of leaving the house was enough to give me a panic attack but now I don't seem to give a feel.
Faye's planning to go to Grenada with a small film crew in March, for the 30th anniversary of the Revo. As a teaser to attract potential funders, she has put together a trailer for the film, which you can see here.
It never fails … Facial Hair + 80s Heart Throb Comparison = Ovulation Indication, i.e. Party in my ovaries and you’re invited Mr. Hairy Construction Worker that favors Billy Ocean.
In light of all this, Jamie Dimon’s promise that J.P. Morgan will “fix it and move on” is not reassuring. The losses here had been mounting for at least six weeks, according to Morgan. Where was the new transparency that’s supposed to allow regulators to catch these things before they get out of hand? . . . . Let’s hope Morgan’s losses don’t turn into another crisis of confidence and they don’t spread to the rest of the financial sector. But let’s also stop hoping Wall Street will mend itself. What just happened at J.P. Morgan – along with its leader’s cavalier dismissal followed by lame reassurance – reveals how fragile and opaque the banking system continues to be, why Glass-Steagall must be resurrected, and why the Dallas Fed’s recent recommendation that Wall Street’s giant banks be broken up should be heeded.More at the link.
After we could fit no more down our little gullets, we wandered the streets of Koln, peeking in store windows and taking pictures in front of stereotypical looking pubs. When it was time for dinner, we found one such pub and squeezed into one of the tiny booths. Americans were a novelty, apparently, and many in the pub blatantly stared at us while we tried to figure out how to order in German. I remember I ate something red...red meat and red cabbage.
His Spirit direct you.
So just as in the Hebrew scriptures examined earlier, it appears that the Greek scriptures actually make reference to those who engaged in idolatrous practices, much of which, as we know, centred around sex in return for favours.
On a superficial level, he could be charming and personable, but his easy manner barely disguised his dark side.
GRAPH
Let your anointed Leader be the torch bearer at all times; let your lieutenants be a team. Put aside your ideologies and stand united for a common goal and agreed pathways.
It is not just this college. It is also building outstanding university programmes at NUS, NTU and SMU.
The nastiest thing about being a surgical nurse is not all the ick that emerges when patients are cracked open. It´s not the blood, the puke or the stuff that happens when people die. No, the nastiest thing is when you prep a patient for surgery and you have to clean their bellybutton. No nastier filth on the planet than the stuff that hides inside people´s bellybuttons.
Mihai Cirstea: “To viewers like myself, who are not avid followers of the superhero genre, The Avengers was successfully appealing because of its constant humor that lightens up the heavier comic book influences. The scene that I found particularly amusing was when the Hulk smashes Loki back and forth against the floor like a rag doll. Stark’s humor, of course, also adds levity to the movie with his constant sarcasm. These moments of humor reminded me of the Superman comics, in which Siegel often offset the heavy plot with a snarky quip from his hero.”
There is an irony here as well. At the time of taking this course, I shared a home with all the qualities (okay, except the vaulted roof) in this pictorial with my still healthy dog and husband of nearly 30 years as you will see when I, one day soon, share those photos.
They believed that wearing the glasses before and during flights could help the internal human clock adjust more easily to changing time zones. The researchers were looking for a commercial partner to help them further study the glasses and make them widely available.
I checked my caller ID, and did a reverse look-up online, and it did go to Niemann Foods in Quincy, IL. Meant nothing to a supergeek like me: There's an app out there that will call your phone with anyone's phone number in the caller ID. Someone is yanking. my. chain.
John Crowe, 57, Rutherford, N.J.
I collect and provide sanctuary for heart-shaped rocks but was thrilled to spot this other type of heart-shaped rock during our recent road trip to Death Valley National Park.
The Princess Bride - William Goldman
Spent friday night celebrating my niece's birthday with my family in OKC,
He is the author of ’X’ The Arthur Shilling Press 2010, ‘Attack of the Gas Powered Angles’ KnivesForksandSpoons 2010, ‘Chimera’ Erbacce Press 2009 ‘Poems found at the scene of a murder’ ZimZalla (July 2010)
Overall, it's an okay beer when it's served warm and flat. We'll see what a week in the chill chest does.
Having graduated high school located within an Amish community, I'm sure my perception of the Amish is different than the average person. When I hear "Amish" I automatically think of the elderly lady who would stop by to use the school's telephone, the lady who we would buy produce from by the side of the road who kept their buggy in their garage, or the girl who would take my money at the store that sells bulk foods.
So do I have places that I have an attachment to? Not so much. I accept that there are different mes depending on who I am with but I’ve never been able to perceive a different me based on where I am.
Leapbeer #131 is Indica Pale Ale by Lost Coast Brewery
There is a flash–a blinding light! I see a grand hall, if the stale, earthy word “grand” can even begin to describe the spectacular, mind-boggling grandiosity of its design. A host of towering celestial beings fill the room. They stand at attention, their muscular faces glowing with wisdom and valour, their broad shoulders tall, chests and arms tensed and ready for warfare. They wait. Wait in expectation, gazing intently at their Master’s face. The Master, the King of this realm, is not looking on His subjects. His face is turned to the earth below. He is watching. Waiting. Listening……
Veteran Derry republican Sean Keenan, who had just been released from Long Kesh, delivered the oration at the grave side.
I entered this in the following Challenges:
In contrast, the Home Affairs Select Committee, chaired by Mr Vaz, has taken a far more structured approach with witnesses. Mr Vaz’s practice is to deal with one area at a time, giving the members of the Committee turns to ask about the specific areas identified before moving on to another part of the investigation. This seems to be a more logical way of proceeding, allowing MPs to follow up on and return to issues raised in the answers.
Theist: Tell more about the time-god’s victims ; those smelly, grunting, disgusting, hairy, sexual perverted, cannibalistic beasts that the human race once was? I don’t believe a word of it but go ahead tell me anyway. It is very interesting.
I remember my mother painting for hours with oils on canvas. She would begin with a white canvas and stretch it on its frame. With a staple gun she would secure the canvas. Out of nothing I would watch as she created amazing landscapes, sunsets and ethereal visions; Sometimes her perspectives became dark and moody. Our home in Chicago was an always a tremendous palette of color and sounds. Our lives were alive with the arts. I was captivated with my mother as she would take a simple white piece of paper and begin drawing in charcoal revealing a graceful arm, arched into thin air. It was magic to me. My father was a singer when he wasn’t working. From his studio his tenor voice would float through our split level home as he practiced his pieces to La Traviata or The Flying Dutchman. November of last year, I find a full center page layout, and article written in the Northern Illinois Gas Company monthly Magazine. It is titled, “Our Man at the Lyric Opera”. There he is, with all his stage makeup, in his costume, showing the complicated process of getting ready for stage time. There he is, in photos, smiling as the one of the Flying Dutchmen’s crew. This is part of the reason I love Pirate of the Caribbean. It is the story adapted to today’s world. And it holds so much I already identify with.
No. It didn't solve anything. In fact, in the dream, I think she had managed to convince a judge to give her even more money, which is why I finally lost it and figured it couldn't hurt to tell her like it is.
Line 2: which amuses me to no end. B
A third of the time I spend hacking out the most recent episode of a long-term series I'm writing: the technology series; the how-to-DM series; the RPG-cliche series ... and so on. And if I don't feel like writing one of those, or I haven't had time to do the research on one of those, I either don't write at all, or I write the sort of drivel I'm writing now.
The flow
Its Tuesday and time for another TTC with the Scrappy Mom's. Instead of a Cricut challenge today the challenge is a 3-D item and you have to use a button and/or twine.
The Salvation Army Central Oklahoma Area Commander Major Dan Proctor, center, honored longtime Advisory Board members Jay Engelbach, left, and Denver Woolsey, right, with the Life Member Award for their years of service to The Salvation Army.
But this is also entirely dependent on whether the court roll can accommodate an additional case on the day or not.
Violet kept going, forcing Laurel to walk backwards.
Some were going pre-season training with Hedge-End. In what I now recognise as a fit of pique I decided on a fresh start with BTC. My rationale behind this decision was based almost entirely around the short distance to their ground on Stoneham Lane. I would be able to watch all of Football Focus on a Saturday afternoon then cycle to home games and still have time to spare. I recall sitting in Southampton Common on a warm May afternoon having come to accept that in playing my last game for Burridge, the opportunities to see many of my friends would be reduced by our busy lives to the occasional get-together.
This Bloodless Age was the height of sophistication compared to some of our earlier films. Here are a couple of images from those hazy 8mm days.
Only the wealthy few have had income growth in the last 30 years.
“EACH BELIEVER has received a gift that manifests the Spirit’s power and presence. That gift is given for the good of the whole gathering…and in the gathering, the Spirit works all these things in each one individually as He sees fit.” Paul of Tarsus, I Cor. 12:7,11
If you can, please leave your comment here instead of on Twitter. Thanks! Have a fabulous day!
Word Count: 1289
The next night, I had another dream. In this one, I realized on the Thursday of the wedding week--as in, the night of the bachelorette party--that I had actually commited to being a bridesmaid in two different weddings that same weekend, one in DC, one in Vermont. I just hadn't realized until that moment that they overlapped. Woops.
Oh how I absolutely love this movie. I don’t care about being laughed at that this film is ranked so high. I am huge fan of the series and I think the chemistry between these two is at a level that is missing in films today. This was the ultimate buddy film series. And this was easily the best and funniest in my book. I watched this movie while waiting for the furniture delivery man – with that amazing 4 – 8 hr delivery window – a few weeks ago. To me it’s a personal classic. I believe that the chemistry between these two main characters will never be duplicated. And it was back before we knew just how crazy Mel Gibson really is.
By the way, Iam taking Monday and Tuesday off this next week to let my soul catch up with my body. It may only be a week of my life over the last seven days, but a week can feel like a lifetime.
Now, Dona Estrella has heard from her distant cousin again.....the monks will not be coming after all.
Brandon Holstein: So it seems like you were really able to put everything together this year, would you attribute this to more time spent in the film or weight rooms or do you think most of it came from the coaching you received?
Here are some observations from my first week and half with the little nugget:
My father had been involved in his own constant battle with depression but had refused therapy and medication on personal grounds. He had contemplated death on numerous occasions in the past, but in 1999 he was diagnosed with Barret’s Esophagus. For three months, he was forced to come to terms with the fact that he may have cancer and could be dying. When the results finally came in, that it was not cancerous, he was not relieved but angry. He wanted to die and cancer would have taken the responsibility out of his hands. He was, as he put it, “all dressed up with nowhere to go.”
The last time was today, and most notable against pocket kings. I mean, I do need to refine my game ALOT, the person raised, I reraised him after the flop, and he went all in. There was a King on the board. I honestly put him on AK, but honestly, should you really lay that down in heads up ever? I mean, yeah, I guess I should have layed it down. But the odds of that are very very very slim. I’ll take the one loss every 12 times I am dealt the hand. But I have taken most peoples advice, bet it heavy and early. Because in the end it is just a pair that can be taken down by 23 off suit if the flop dictates.
Do I have any excuse for not resuming my Rosetta Stone Spanish lessons? No.
Second, what new hobbies do you want to take up? Everybody should have at least one hobby they should go to that doesn't involve technology. Knitting, crocheting, sewing, embroidery, cooking, baking, makeup, ANYTHING! Pick up a new hobby for the new you.
More news...Our new Website is up!!! Sooo exciting!! There are a few little tweeks to be done but I couldn't wait (very impatient actually :)) Hope you like The New Look!! Let me know what you all think!!
So here's my plan. I'm going to visit my mother, and buy groceries, and at least do a little bit of Clean Out The Closet. Then I'm going to call Princess Summerfallwinterspring and test the idea out on her. If she likes it, and almost more to the point, if she can figure out how to resolve the brand new situation I created thanks to the smoke detector, I'll go back to writing, something I swore I would never do again.
Another thing is actively trying to relax. In the evenings I often do housework, then marking, then dinner, then more marking or emails etc then end up in bed without really thinking about it. For the last three weeks this has not happened. I have made time for me and I have relaxed. The lovely @IVFStory kindly sent me her Zita West CD and on many occasions I have taken myself to bed, put the CD on and listened to her calming words until I have fall asleep.
1. Write click on the Eclipse icon and click run as administrator and launch the SDK manager
I believe that on this aspect of privacy the French have got it right. I agree that in some cases their privacy laws may be considered far too stringent. But I can't believe that this poor woman's death is in the public interest, and am so impressed that they are being respectful of this.
"I even like the back of their knees you know." I was in the middle of trying to pot a particularly tricky red at the time. I stood up from the shot knowing that wouldn't be possible till I'd heard him out. "They're exquisite, aren't they? There's a softness, a freshness, that you just don't get with a man's knee. Then of course there's the calves. I love a calf..."
7) I am very intuitive. I have "known" of deaths, miscarriages, and baby genders of those who are close to me before they happened.
This year welcomes the ninth version of this single batch, limited release green-hopped brew. As many wet (fresh and undried) hops as are picked are added as quick as the truck can take them and the total quantity of hops determines the batch size. The hops, all as yet unavailable and experimental varieties, were picked on March 3rd and went straight into the kettle.
3-4 cups of Coconut milk
Mugison: Oh yes, I still have my own festival in Iceland. I listen to all the demos of the artists who want to play at the festival, so I know what lives in my homeland. At the moment there's a big hardcore scene. Not brilliant, but interesting. The problem with this kind of music is that all the songs sound the same. Maybe I have to solve that problem. (laughs) In contrary, electronic music field brings less good stuff. And of course you have the singer-songwriters, with a few great talents. The problem I see with young bands is that they are not prepared to die for their music. Most bands have fun, and that is OK. I wish that one or two bands would have the spirit to sacrifice everything to succeed in music business. Youngsters probably need an example, a deliverer. It's waiting for the one on the white horse.
9. Toby Stephens (Die Another Day)
I was the first?!?! How?!?! All I could think was how impossible that is. She must have just missed them running in. It was hard to tell who was who when they ran past the finish line. How could the boyfriend end up behind me? I didn’t see him, and I kept my eyes open for him the whole time.
Beer Log: February 26, 2008
Britten tells his therapists, both the real Dr. Lee and the imaginary Dr. Evans, that he is willing to move with Hannah to Portland. However, in his dream, he'll be remaining in Los Angeles with Rex. Dr. Lee thinks that moving to Portland will weaken Britten's ability to maintain the reality of his dream, and that Britten will finally recognize it for the dream it is -- which means acknowledging that Rex really is dead. Dr. Evans predicts that Britten will fight against the loss of his "dream" of Hannah, but will eventually give in. Britten assures her that he will not. "This thing works because I make it work."
There are a few sewing related challenges so I am entering there as well:
This Thanksgiving, I got to enjoy extended time with family. The strange and beautiful thing about family is you can be yourself, let your true colors shine, and just process life in its rawness and for the most part, your family will just accept this as you, as normal. On Thursday, after we had eaten a small feast, we all went in our separate directions. Literally, we parted like the Red Sea. The younger folk took the basement, the Aunt and Uncle took a rest, Grandma took the couch, I went to the hotel, and mom went to do some errands. And you know what? We were all pretty content to be apart for awhile and catch some winks while we digested our turkey and cream laden sweet potatoes.
Hail, Damaging winds, and possible tornadoes (as well as several confirmed tornadoes) have been associated with this strong low pressure system.
My card is based on Dawny's sketch at Simon Says Stamp Blog and I used My Mind's Eye Blush line. The tiny little tag says Lily, but it's difficult to see. Here is the card:
Mesdan shakes himself awake and alert again, drawing his eyes up and away from the dream shell. Darkness has surrounded him completely. The glow of the shell shimmers for a few more seconds and then fades away. His heart begins to pound and Mesdan becomes terribly aware of how alone he is in the darkness. It takes a few deep, calming breaths to remember his purpose here.
So questions remain: would Forest City, after getting significant subsidies for infrastructure and the benefit of eminent domain, be required to build its project on any schedule, or could it leave interim surface parking lots indefinitely in Prospect Heights? What profit might the developer actually earn? Should the project be as big as proposed? Is the risk faced more by the public, or by the developer?
“Oh, you mean that Gawd!”
Shenouda's death has attracted warm tributes from, among others, the Archbishop of Canterbury who spoke of Shenouda's "exemplary and outstanding" leadership and his "depth of Christian love, welcome and wisdom." Less attention has been paid to his cosy relationship with Mubarak or his history of making nasty anti-semitic remarks.
According to the author 'At its essence a cake is actually a delicate chemical equation, a balance between air and structure. You give your cake too much structure, it becomes tough, too much air, it falls apart.'
She fell into forgotten
Many of you may already know the sweet and gorgeous Liz of Explore. Dream. Discover. (formerly From Portland to Peonies), but if you don’t… it’s time to get acquainted. Liz and her cute hubby live over in Amsterdam and take lots of gorg photos of their travels around town and around Europe, and of course of their adorable French Bulldog, Henry. Visiting Liz’s blog is like a trip to Europe for coffee with a friend, and you’ll be inspired by her impeccable style and sunny outlook. Go say hello!
By the time of the Reformation, no secular government had chartered more universities than the church. Edward Grant, who has written on medieval science for Cambridge University Press, points out that intellectual life was robust and debate was vigorous at these universities — the very opposite of the popular presumption.
11.- Do not be continually finding fault.
Hi friends -
So why are you still blogging until now?
Like all good things come to an end, so has the strawberries season in India. Actually, this year has been better than before, as my father-in-law was frequently having work-related Mahabaleshwar trips, we've been spoiled silly by loads and loads of these berries.
Gauley Bridge
In theUnited Kingdom, the first Monday of May is a bank holiday. Since May 1 does not always fall on a Monday, May Day festivities have been moved to the Monday bank holiday for the public’s convenience. Some communities inEnglandstill commence celebrations at sunset on April 30 with processions through town centres and floral decorations. Padstow holds the annual Obby Oss, which is thought to be the oldest May Day celebration in the country dating back to the 13th century.
Partly because it's headquartered on my doorstep, but mainly because manager Stephen has shown an incredible enthusiasm for the whole speciality beer segment. It has been a delight to deliver the tasting sessions in the basement (and if you were at one of them over the past few months -- thanks for being such a great crowd) and even more of a delight to be at the sessions where other people did the talking. I'm looking forward to more of those in the New Year.
I can read myself up some new friends,
Hardly recognised him up there on the platform. Didn’t look anything like Commander Scott in that ‘Warzone’ movie. Like someone had taken his ass and shaved off a few inches here and there. Felt good knowing I could take him without breaking sweat.
The best thing about it is that it is, mainly, a silent film. According to one of my film major friends, when it came out a ton of people asked for their money back because they didn’t know and unfortunately couldn’t enjoy the simple beauty of silent films.
waking up in places that are not *Home*... So yeah ~ I completely understand
12. Joan Weber - Goodbye Lollipops, Hello Lipstick (I'm Not a Baby Anymore)
I don’t care what anyone thinks, I love Pee-Wee Herman.
I need to take my contacts out.
Real references - good:
Nothing special planned (except maybe finally getting to see the Avengers movie this week)!
The answer to all the above questions is Jesus Christ. What do all those unbelievers think about Him? He is the only Saviour. He died on the cross and shed His blood. That blood was the price of redemption for all who were lost, including you and me. He rose from among the dead as proof of the completed transaction of redemption. He paid the full price, which was exacted by the Father in eternity past.
On a positive note, scrum half Tawera Kerr Barlow is back in training and will be availible for the Lions match.
The creation of a framework, an atmosphere, a structure, is not prayer, but it is a necessary preliminary to prayer. It is within the atmosphere of inner discipline and simplicity that prayer can begin to grow. The eastern church, in its teaching on prayer focuses on the constant use of the Name of Jesus. The first recorded teaching about the invocation of the Name of Jesus comes in the mid- fifth century writer Diadochus. He recommended the prayer “Lord Jesus Christ have mercy on me” as a way of cleansing the mind of its sickness, and he recommended this to beginners. The Prayer of Jesus was to be used inwardly and secretly at all times – when dropping off to sleep, when waking, when eating or drinking, while talking. It is seen as a prayer which both binds the mind and unifies the personality. Thus Philotheus of Sinai in the tenth c century says: “By the memory of Jesus Christ gather together your mind that is scattered abroad. Through the Fall this dis-integration has happened, but memory of God restores primal wholeness.”
24 Setsubun Bean Unit - Gujo Ondo (Wire Tapper Exclusive Edit)
B: Wombat, it's The Boss.
I am hearing...Just the laptop keys as I type.
She waited until Roger was only a few feet away.
If we were to assume that of this overhang of 150,000 dwellings, half were in areas where demand is unlikely to present in the short term, then by the middle of 2012, mindful of the underlying demand of about 50,000 dwellings per year, in areas close to larger population centres, the current overhang of new homes yet unsold could be eliminated.
iCloud was released as a remedy to the debacle that was MobileMe. Often not working correctly and arguably overpriced when pitted against the free alternatives offered by Google, Dropbox and the rest, MobileMe was doomed from the outset. With nothing but outages and issues when it initially launched, MobileMe was instantly seen as a failure and then never really regained the trust of users after that.
Example: There was a story in your news on a politician making a speech, and there was some members of the “Occupy Movement” present. Whom were in “Their” opinions “Exercising” their “Freedom of Speech and Freewill Movement”. As this politician was making her speech, she was “Interupted” with chanting of announcement of the “Act or Movement” of the “People” that were present for some “Change/Changes”. What truely did this do possibly however Chelas? Think for a moment on this one….One must put themselves upon anothers path or shoes persay. IF you were speaking and someone outburst across the top of you, interupting you and DIS-honoring that place you are in and coming from. What do you suppose “YOUR” Reaction would be? Lets be open and honest in our feelings here in the NOW Chelas. This only leads to a confortation which is truely a “Combat” a bicker backer back and forth…is this really going anywhere? What momentums of energy are possibly created in such ways?
I love living in the city instead of in the country.
So it is often said about March. Okay so we’re actually into April now, but only just.
9:00 – Blair, In One Wind, Maia MacDonald @ Sycamore $10 (21+)
Jennifer It`s a quilt that I see every day because it's on my bed, affectionately known as The Big One (I usually play the straight woman in the comedy team that is my marriage, so I'll just leave it at that and let Greg fill in the rest).
Here then, is the poem reprinted:
Have you finally gotten rid of that paunch? Tell me you're wearing an uber-hot black dress and posing for pictures without sucking in your tummy. That kind of spoils your smile,you know?I mean, you either smile pretty at the camera's or concentrate on hiding the paunch right?
I better not go off on a tangent here. Anyway, I am really, really impressed and happy with the gum reduction!! The difference is DRASTIC. The recovery was about 1 day of mildly sore gums. And it's not even that expensive at about $1,000 to $2,000++! If I knew I would have done this LONG ago.
-The journey of a thousand miles begins with a single step.
Clark was charged with distribution Class A drugs, distribution Class A drugs within 1,000 feet of a school zone and distribution Class A second offense.
11 They surrounded me,
13. cuddling and watching tv with the bf
Psalm 30 vs 5 – For His anger is but for a moment , His favor is for life; weeping may endure for a night , But joy comes in the morning
So I'll keep following the French, doing my best to learn who the competitors are and to understand the commentators who insist on talking over each other. The French are having a great Olympics so far, with the exception of Brian Joubert, who expected to medal in men's figure skating, ended up in 18th place after the short program, and Marion Rolland, who blew out her knee on the top of the mountain in the women's downhill. Heartbreaking for both of them.
Regardless of my error, you’re getting the photo essay.
Over the course of time, my life has changed significantly from that hot West Texas afternoon. I left the ranch and saw the world. I became a successful researcher, executive, and entrepreneur. On this journey I faced many trials and challenges. Challenges, problems, and crisis that would terrify you, that would make you give up all hope, and that would rob you of your joy. Invariably when faced with such challenges, with such great fears, I would always go back to the day of that Barbeque, and remember that snake.
And his teacher gave him an A
You know, when you go for a swim in a lake, it’s all good and well.
-my upcoming, whirlwind trip to OKC at the end of the month looming ahead
5. Exercise! It helps to blow off steam and kicks your brain back into gear. Note: Dancing is exercise.
I love the raw emotion of it combined with great humour. It’s an amazing story that most people will connect with. I was crying my eyes out when I first saw it, and a lot of the people around me in the theatre were crying as well, so prepare some tissues when you watch it. And no, I had not read the autobiography beforehand, but I didn’t need to, I would be on any project Cameron Crowe invited me to be in. I’m a huge fan, ‘Almost Famous’ is one of my favorite movies ever.
with them and you. Don’t look now, but people in positions of
Would you please
Yesterday Mom, (or 'Mama' as she likes to be called) made the mistake of not locking me up properly in "THE KENNEL." I managed to squeeze myself out of there while 'Daddy' said I should have been named 'Houdini,' whoever that is.
A rare and special occurence.
I do not discredit science, but it we got here through evolution, then why aren’t we still evolving? We watched an interesting video in philosophy the other day. It was all about the new advances being made in discovering the origin of man. The new findings contradict what we supposedly already know, but we just close our minds to only hear what we want. This is a knowledge filter.
In the four springs I've lived here I've never bothered to clean it out, which I know is an important thing to do if you want to have healthy birds nesting in it. Last year was the first year I really paid attention to the box and I caught an adult chickadee exiting it many times. I knew someone must be using it, but I never looked inside, not wanting to disturb a potential nest.
Did you learn something new about crystal that surprised you?
Makes a little stir
And for today, I am grateful for Campbell's chicken and noodle soup!
You tie the knot when I'm at the end of my rope,
This weekend was supposed to be fun and relaxing. It was supposed to include a copious amount of trail running, but what it turned into is a weekend of PAIN. It all started yesterday evening when my roller ride turned tragic. I was almost done with the ride and was just pushing out some finishing sprints through the high resistance gears when I lost control and the bike hopped off the rollers and came to an abrupt stop. A nice slow motion fall to the ground happened while I tried to figure out how to stop it and this wonderful body damage happened.
AND THAT IS HOW YOU TEACH CHILDREN ABOUT METAPHORS.
We started our group,
Form dough into teaspoon-sized truffle bites, press into mini muffin tins or candy molds. Dust with extra cocoa powder if desired. Refrigerate for 30 minutes to firm up then remove carefully. (I’m not sure what the longest is you should store them for, but I’ve had mine in the fridge for a couple weeks and have been nibbling on them daily.)
Do you find it difficult to lose weight and live healthy?
Nothing stays the same, but everything outward is reflected inwardly with an eternal tint. I think of the metaphor of pruning in John 15. Some prunings are bigger than others. Sometimes life is pruned so radically it's alarming, and doesn't fit my idea of how things "should" be. Do I really ultimately know what "health" means? Do I really know what is for the ultimate good of myself or the world?
NOTE: Spoilers to Follow! In the highly unlikely event that you're planning on running your PC's through Temple of the Frog, don't allow them to read any further.
To emerge
i'm still stuck in grownup work land. *sigh* i'll be back to normal soon.
Dangle forbidden fruit & I am bound to take a bite. Well, Parker, I can keep a secret if you can. But the thrill, the rush of sneaking around was short-lived. Parker started memorizing my school schedule & would conveniently pop outside of my classrooms smoking a cigarette. At first it was a cute coincidence, but it became unattractive pretty quickly. As I said before, the difference between creepy & cute is how mutual the attraction is. And taboo or not, I was not digging Professor Parker.
7. With water, clean out the ear area with fingers and behinf ear with thumb 1 time.
One of the reason’s that Lincoln’s story is fascinating is that, in a sense, it could be described as a “rags to riches” kind of story. Born in 1809 to a poor farm family in Kentucky, his enjoyment for reading and learning, as well as a hard working attitude, helped him to eventually become a lawyer. His family moved several times during his formative years, eventually settling in Illinois in 1830, where Lincoln would finally leave his family, and set out on his own. In 1831, he settled in New Salem, and lived there for six years. In 1832, he served as Captain of Militia during the Black Hawk War. Although gratified at being elected to the position, he and his men saw no action. It was also while in New Salem that he became interested in politics, and in 1834, he was elected to the state legislature. A prominent Whig, he was reelected three times. In 1839, he met Mary Todd, and the two became engaged the following year, and despite some problems, married in November of 1842, not long after moving to his practice to Springfield, Illinois.
We drive for about a hour and we stop at a small town to eat. The bitch of coarse requested 10 different chain restaurants. I tell her that there are no chain restaurants in the middle of nowhere and she will have to settle for mom and pop restaurant. The food was good and after we get done eating my buddy asks me to pick up the tab so he can go and smoke. Not a problem. He gets up and goes out. My wife and I are sitting there and the bitch just gets up without saying a word and leaves. I am thinking she is getting up to go to the bathroom. Shortly after my wife gets up and goes to the bathroom as well. My wife comes back and tells me that the bitch is in the car. I’m thinking well fuck her then. As you can tell this is starting to snow ball. My wife and I talk about this and assures me that we will be home soon. I feel much better.
You do wonder what happened to people like Stefan and Carl, who I suspect have both become right wing republican fascists, and Evan, who reports say still lets his freak flag fly....and then we already know about Mary Beth---she has mellowed out a lot, and her fantastic sister Wendy who lives nearby and is much the same, and hopefully I will soon hear back from Carrie (the first girl I LIKED in 6th grade...)who lives HERE but has not been feeling well....
A few months ago I wrote my post about my experience with low milk supply and I was swamped with loving emails and comments from people who went through similar issues. I felt for the people sending me their stories of wanting so badly to breastfeed their babies, but who eventually had to just give up and give the baby a bottle. I totally get that, and I have been there (hugs).
The reason I seem to concentrating on the resurrection body, is not so much to prove what the resurrection body will be, although that naturally becomes a part of the mix, the real reason for the focus is to show the location of that resurrection body. If the location of the resurrection body can be identified beyond reasonable doubt, this naturally will tell us where the seat of that government would have to logically exist, so I do see this as an important aspect of figuring out where the holy ones will rule from, either heaven or earth.
5. Baby Alive 1st For Me
Come up with an idea you like about meaning and reason and test it by attempting to use that idea to effect a specific outcome. If the test bears out your idea, then you adopt the result and use it as a tool to investigate more ideas. This is called 'having a life and living it'. If your idea works, then at this point, you experience 'belief' and 'certainty' and 'increased efficiency'.
Shona Cole I light an incense stick. I put on my iPod and listen to Damien Rice, Jack L, Yael Naim, Glen Hansard, Eivor Palsdottir, Loreena McKennitt, Fiona Apple. Before I write I listen to or read poetry like B.H. Fairchild, Billy Collins, Claudia Emerson. Often I will browse craft books/magazines/blogs to remind me I am part of a larger group of creatives and that makes me want to get to work.
First I made some simple gift tags using kraft card, (which I cut using a tag die from Spellbinders), the Gratitude stamp set and the following powders: Fluorescent Tickled Pink, Fluorescent Yellow, Fluorescent Orange, Fluorescent Green and Fluorescent Blue, finished off with some pretty ribbon. These gift tags would be great for mothers day presents as well as loads of other occasions. I've already used one on a gift for a friend and am planning to batch make loads more to have ready for the rest of the year. Hope you like them.
When I asked if she had happened to pop in and see her new great-great grandchild born to my cousin, she replied, “Of course!”
I have to go back to work and I CAN"T I DON"T WANT TO I'm scared I haven't worked in over a year!!! I don't think i can be a submissive wife, Good mom, keep a clean house and work.
Genii had previously shown interest in buying Group Lotus and its said that he was in talks with Proton before DRB-Hicom purchased their stake.. Lopez hasn’t ruled out such a move but is unsure if the possibility would present itself, “We don’t know yet, because we really do not know what the new owner wants to do with it.”
Until next time have fun!
From then on, Chris plays a desperate game, trying to spare his friends yet save his own life…
As it is, he couldn't even muster the courage to do that much.
It got me thinking about stuff. Me. Us. It was such a reflection as to why, we in the American church, really have no patience for each other or for God's way of doing things. Like, seriously.
Identifying and defining the problem has in itself been a weight off my shoulders. Now I know it’s not me (it’s not my fault, it’s not about whether I am or am not a nice or difficult person or a good or incompetent worker) most of the emotional baggage and indecision is removed. As far as my boss goes I’m damned if I do and damned if I don’t, so there’s no point me stressing so much about it.
I threaded twine through the holes. This is what it will hang from.
Are you ready to start our trip? Climb aboard! Today we visit lovely, lush, sub-tropical St. Simons Island, Georgia. St. Simons Island is a barrier island off the coast of Georgia, along with Jekyll, Sea Island and privately owned Little Simons Island. Of the four Golden Isles, St Simons is the largest with 16.6 square miles of land, and 1.3 square miles of water. Their temperatures average in the 80′s in the late spring and summer, and the 50′s in the winter. July is usually hottest with temperatures in the 90′s. (information from weather.com)
(Shoot took place up near Boettcher Mansion, Golden CO)
Aaaaand…go!
I really think I needed this,
but then I write 1000-2000 words and I still have 5000 words left to write.
My writing options this week as far as subject matter goes were, and I quote verbatim: 1. the bunny and the dandelions, 2. something about the clouds, 3. something about gardening because this is a garden blog, and 4. the tortoise almost ran away. As suggested to me by my sounding board of 12 years whilst I was collapsed in a heap regretting I had nothing to write about (again). All were rejected in favor of answering reader “questions”. Much more entertaining. And I would have to do actual research (sort of) to find out about clouds beyond what I learned from Sesame Street and the ninth grade.
I've also used a punch from MS.
These sandwich years are very challenging, caught between the needs of young families for support and love, and the unforeseen but instantly-appearing Mom-emergencies. It's hard to find time to write, and when I do, I feel my umber mood is visible in my words.
There is an unfinished part of us that is reaching out to become satisfied or whole and this gives a temporary and artificial substitute. A common feature of ecstasy clubbers is a need to escape from themselves which in a healthier age would have led to a mystic journey in solitude as eremites counting their beads and communing with God. In our degraded times they are prey for the hard-headed business people who use any fashion to make money out of their own people.
The boys got their report cards last week. They both did really well and made all A's. I made a copy of their report cards before I returned them so we can get some yummy free donuts at Krispy Kreme one day this week. Krispy Kreme is so not on my diet, but a yummy chocolate iced donut sure does sound good right now:) I need to get back on my diet after being off for a week while I was sick...though I actually lost about three pounds while I was sick because I all I did was drink Diet Sprite and each chocolate pudding!
The severed head of the family dog is waiting to be found in the hallway. In a move defying logic and sanity, Helen sees the murder weapon in a pool of blood, so she decides to pick it up. Brilliant deductive reasoning, Helen. Maybe you should spit on the dog and tear some of your hair out, in case they need DNA evidence to go with your fingerprints.
I hope that you get a chance to slow down at least a little this summer. Write back and let me know what you do to take things just a bit easier this season. Or if you don't get to take the summer off, how do you make the most of your weekend relaxation?
Thanks Susan for having me as your guest designer today and it was wonderful to be back again! :)
A final word of wisdom from Ms. Porter: “Within the next 10-15 years from now, if people don’t get more involved in what is going on in this community, it is going to go back to the way it was.”
3. Toxic Relations is a Reason People Fail at Time Management most of us never even consider as a factor. You know your co-workers that hang out and participate in Idle Chat every chance they get? Or the “so-called friends” who get you to stay out late and spend your time in activities that move you away from your goals? Toxic Relations move you further from your Money Making Hours and closer to Time Trash.
The Church is under attack from all sides, and this lawsuit is just another arrow in the quiver. If the left and "progressives" can destroy the Catholic youth, from school age through college, they feel the rest of the Church will fall.
Now, before I continue, let me just clarify one thing: yes, we realise that Jack is a very young Prep. The decision to send our boy to school this year took a very long time to make, and involved his kinder teachers, the Prep teachers at his school, ourselves, and our son. Being secondary school teachers ourselves, Christian and I thought about the ramifications of Jack being one of the younger ones in his year level during VCE. I have worried for months about my boy being ready for school - should I give him another year of play? Will he cope with the rigours of school? Is he too little for primary school?
“What can i do for you this time?” Asked that guy as he’s walking closer to Jessica.
Senators Bingaman, Kirk, and Sanders are hosting a briefing today on “Expanded Learning Time as a School Improvement Strategy.” Joining the National Center on Time and Learning, the US Department of Education and others, Lucy Friedman, TASC’s President, is presenting lessons from ExpandED Schools and from CBASS partner cities including Providence. I’m encouraged that Senators are hosting an opportunity for the expanded learning community to share knowledge about what works to get results, and how flexible federal policy can boost, not get in the way of better outcomes for kids in all sorts of communities.
Now, even though barbecued meat and pickled veggies are involved, never fear — you don’t have to have anything prepped in advance of the day you make these.
Seabear - I Sing I Swim
the dripping of mental poisons;
To be eligible for the prize, please remember to tell us who's project you chose to case, show the original project and link back to the original post
And, finally, this one. Had MOre than one or two of these. Beer Blokes Golden-ish Lager, Beer Blokes Pale Ale, Beer Blokes Wheat Beer and Beer Blokes Beast.
Marvel as Bill Brewster saws himself in half
- but they can be sensed by voodoo priests (Predator 2) and Native American Shaman types (Predator), so they have some kind of spiritual presence
It was a perfect place for the "Saving Muddy Hillgrass" party.
Cheap accommodations – Hostels are fine if you are just looking for a place to grab a shower and snooze but if you want to savor the atmosphere of a Paris neighborhood, check out weekly apartment rates or room rentals where you can cook and hang close to home to keep your out of pocket expenses low.
For my cards, I used papers and images from Club Scrap. I hope you enjoy :)
The Bible speaks clearly about demons being fallen angels and Satan being the leader. It talks about humans being overtaken by these demons and their every action controlled by them. It speaks of those who do not believe in God and Jesus being possessed to the point of their very souls being owned by them. It tells of people who are freed from this control but never totally surrendering to God and therefore being overtaken again. It tells us that Christians can yield their well-being to evil spirits and live in an oppressed state of being.
Close by the exit from the Heart of Darkness was a guest book in which visitors were invited to leave their impressions and comments. Elisabeth pointed to it and said, “Hey — are you going to speak out there? Maybe tell the truth?”
The landscape in the Kruger National Park is very varied - from savanna plains to bush and scrub, from granite outcrops (koppies) which simply pop up out of the rolling plains to mountains, from rivers and waterholes to forests. And of course, one can't omit the dramatic sunrises and sunsets.
pattern, but if you sell them online, you must link to this crochet pattern. You may not sell this crochet pattern or claim it as your own. You may publish or post a link to this crochet pattern, but you may not publish or post this crochet pattern in whole or in part.
that wouldn’t be
Contemplative silence.
It has been a bit over 3 years that I started making my feelings and they changed my life tremendously.
In what may be one of my favorite things to happen in 2012, director Choi Dong-hoon, he of the masterful “Tazza” and the ever-thrilling “Jeonwoochi,” is set to make a comeback with “The Thieves.”
Shock to the System (Sarasota)
Please stay tuned for my next review.
Focus Pocus
4. The line 'you'll never get away with this!' Easily one of my favorite lines to hear in anything.
Luz Santlage – Brooklyn Veterinary Hospital.
2. Has anything really changed from the last time I spoke about it?
It is thinking the nightmare is over…only to realize it still
Goldfrapp – Happiness – The Seventh Tree (2008)
“Some people have doubted the police story of the immigration of beggars, but investigation proves it to be true and unexaggerated. There has been — and continues to be — a steady influx of professional beggars from Europe, lured to these shores by the tales they have heard of the money to be made from ‘those stupid Americans.’ The tales told to them by their enthusiastic relatives in the United States have been to the effect that any lame, halt or blind person, or anyone who could simulate affliction could make more money in greater New York in a week than could be made in Europe in a year.
The event on Saturday (3/10) was also a sendoff for head brewer Bryan Baxter, who's leaving to join Otter Creek Brewing, the Middlebury, Vermont, brewery known for Stovepipe Porter, Copper Ale, Wolaver organic beers, and now a component of Long Trail Brewing of Burlington, Vermont.
Meanwhile, Beaumont has discovered necrophilia is not as much fun as he thought it would be. Perhaps he had not thought this cunning plan all the way through. He certainly had a lack of foresight in trusting a guy named murder, because when he asks for him to bring Madeleine back to life, he learns he is being turned into a zombie, too. Luckily for him, Neil recruit’s a missionary named Dr. Bruner to assist him in rescuing Madeleine.
For the toddler set, there’s a book that’s out just in time for Father’s Day on June 20. Dad and Pop: An Ode to Fathers & Stepfathers by Kelly Bennett ($15.99, Candlewick Press) and illustrated by Paul Meisel is aimed at kids age 4-to-7. In an era when half the marriages end in divorce and often lead to remarriage and a new father figure, this book offers warm illustrations and a comforting text on how to look at a happily blended-family scenario. It reassures that the birth dad and the step-dad both love their child. Dance, Y’All, Dance is another Kelly Bennett book, illustrated in a delightful fashion by Terri Murphy ($16.95, Bright Sky Press) that celebrates country music and the way folks of all ages love to dance to it. It recreates the fun and excitement of Saturday nights at the dancehall for ages 4 to 8. Also among the books for this age group is a wonderful story taken from real life, Miles of Smiles: The Story of Roxey, the Long Island Rail Road Dog (17.95, Blue Martin Publications) by Heather Hill Worthington with warm and wonderful illustration by Bill Farnsworth. Roxey became a legend 1900s when he was granted complete access by the crews of the Long Island railroad system. When he jumped on board President Teddy Roosevelt’s private car Teddy was delighted to learn he had a railroad pass attached to his collar and let him stay for a while.
Me: "Great! If you're going to query you should really do it by email. Do you need our submission guidelines?"
Everything up to a point was normal yesterday. There was no rhyme or reason to it. But I took a hit yesterday.
Yet another reason why I like a service oriented business.
Modern politics is full of negative campaigning and personal attacks. The three main parties may have failed to distinguish themselves in the eyes of the voters, but part of this is due to the public relations politics that Tony Blair brought us back in 1997. How do you introduce something new and interesting when the Labour Party press officers are ready to tear you apart (regardless of the content of your suggestion)? Politics has become less about debating the issues, and more about political point scoring. Eventually, it seems, the opposition decided that if you can't beat them, join them. And perhaps David Cameron is the result.
I never dreamed that I'd gain this much this week.
Wordless Wednesdays/Word-Filled Wednesdays - I will be linking up with 5 Minutes for Mom for their weekly meme OR I will be discussing a Biblical topic
The scientist proposes, and nature disposes. Oft is a beautiful theory (*cough* Luminiferous Aether *cough*) consigned to the ash heap of history because experiment cannot validate it - or even produces the opposite data as what was expected.
Each mask has a unique color and made of different materials. The masks our named after its master, and has unique effects. The masks usually have three effects that increase your skills.
I hope you like the finished result. Enjoy the rest of your evening and thanks for stopping by. Take care and happy crafting everyone!
As an integral part of the ayurvedic tradition of yoga, urine therapy is known as amaroli. Ayurvedic yogis are encouraged to drink their own urine between 4 and 6 A.M. in the morning in the belief that the hormones ingested will facilitate a meditative state.
Our good deeds
Onto business: today is Valentine's Day. I like Valentine's Day. I do not have a valentine, nor do I have the opportunity to get one before the day is out--regardless, I like Valentine's Day. It provides us with a day focused completely on telling people you love that you love them. While if you need a day to remind you that you love the ones you love, you might need to refocus your priorities, I appreciate the fact that Valentine's Day gives me an excuse to tell people I love them, to reconnect with old friends, and to spend a day surrounded by love.
Pour into a large mug and enjoy!
What really makes the Finnish school system different is that the
Exercise for 15 minutes a day: I’m sort of half way there on this one, but there’s a bit more effort required.
* 1 large or 2 small radishes, halved and thinly sliced
Bright Accent Colors Highlight Collection
Did I shed a tear? Why yes I did!
Truth is I'm barely hanging on
Because I have a menu plan, grocery shopping is relatively easy. I just look at the plan, look at what we have, and make a list accordingly. I know what other staples we use regularly so those get added too. It’s amazing how much money you can save when you shop for the menu plan. We don’t have flyers here, so I can’t keep my eyes open for sales and plan from that. What I do is buy regular quantities of different kinds of meat, for example, and I portion them in bags then freeze. For example, because we buy all of our chicken in 30 lb boxes, I cut the legs and thighs apart and freeze 6 pieces per bag. I know this is enough for a satisfying meal for everyone in our family, and a bit for leftovers. Sometimes when I’m menu planning I’ll think about what we have on hand and work that in to the schedule, reducing the amount of shopping we need to do.
Last Sunday was a day of crystal clear skies and a bitingly cold wind. Looking out of the window on the train out to Versailles everything looked bleached under the brilliant sunshine, as on a hot summer day.
However, the media didn’t even consider the facts, that would have been far too politically incorrect. The press wanted what they wanted, and that’s how they wrote the story.
Grated Parmesan cheese
I bet you feel pretty efficient because you can e-mail – text – and tweet almost simultaneously – don’t you! This kind of digital multitasking slashes your IQ by 10 points while you are doing it – according to research from the Institute of Psychiatry at King’s College - London. It actually dumbs you down more than you getting high – which (by the way) shaves of only points on your IQ. So – join us – unplug and get into the great outdoors. It’s amazing how far thinking outside the in-box will get you. And as always you must live well to be well — to your personal wellness…
I particularly like the tracks by Ngaina Lolo (A2 - love the resonance), the one by Simon Sitale (A8 - the mbira like a blanket for cold ears), the storybook-like "Kemai" by Kayoka Ladislas & Beya Marcel (A10), the very Zimbabwean sounding track by Baranganani Mudzanani from South Africa (B3) and the soulful song for the chief by Chabarwa Musanda Mayo Sinyoro** (B4).
share "beautiful things, personal thoughts and
“The Troubles have kept every tie between us and the other families so stretched that many have snapped of their own accord. Why not try a new way? The old way has brought nothing but distrust and destruction.”
Perhaps I'll do my own little "purdy" tree in my bedroom...teehee!
But even with short and sweet our work must maintain validity. For example, if you are writing sci-fi or a futuristic dystopian you can simply make up all the inventions that your world will need. But, will the story be believable? I’m sure several of you will disagree with me, but the minute I start reading anything and the physics of the story are impossible, I’m done. So how can we maintain that balance?
A star. OUR STAR.
3. It is too non-stick! My dad explained, when I was first going on about how amazing my new pans were, that it’s a naturally non-stick surface. No, it’s not teflon-coated. It’s naturally non-stick. What this means to you is: a non-stick surface that you can use metal utensils on without fear of scraping. If you bust up the surface in any way, you can sand it down again and it’s still going to be non-stick.
So was the upgrade worth it… well, the changes aren’t world shattering, but it does include a few new potentially handy features. And of course it is always good to keep your software updated. But probably next time I will wait till I have some time to do a completely clean install, to avoid problems I have been experiencing this time.
These journal entries are designed to give idea of the German EBM/Industrial/Metal/Rock scene to the few readers of my blog.
“Truly, truly, I say to you, unless a grain of wheat falls into the earth and dies, it remains alone; but if it dies, it bears much fruit. ” (John 12:22)
In case you didn't notice................
PS - Now that the blue toile print has come out, I may need to add a few more items to my list.
This is why I said if the decisive cause must come from me it will never come because it is not there in me. It is there because Christ created it in me. I bring nothing decisive in creation or keep it. No more than the universe created or kept itself.
Vishnu the Hindu god in his latest reincarnation as Kalki leads his warriors into battle on a white horse. The four horsemen of the Apocalypse are Red, Black,white and Pale or Green.
Battle of the Bulge
Not ready for Christmas? Don't worry, it's not holiday specific (though it does kinda lean towards girlier gifts), what can I say- you're at Seven Sisters, not Buncha Brothers! :) I really tried to think of things that the gift giver would definitely use, love and enjoy. Things that you just can't have too much of...really nice colorful cloth dinner napkins are one of my secret loves as well as pretty stationary.
Speaking of superficiality, another popular topic is the issue of make-up. All that vitamin B+ foundation, gel eyeliner, UV-protection powders and ultra-moisturizing lip balms, aren’t all these things feminine tools used to allure men to their destruction? Perhaps the best answer I could think to that is: any straight-thinking, upright lady would be the least interested in leading any man to his destruction (unless you were an evil stepmother in an Indonesian drama series seeking revenge on her son’s lover. Now THAT kind of make-up should be haraam) – besides, if men were really so easily aroused that a little powder and blush excites them (pardon me), then I think the problem isn’t in the make-up at all. Of course, I personally think that over-indulging in make-up is an absolute no-no, purely for practical reasons. If praying 5 times a day meant scrubbing everything off and re-painting it all on afterwards every time, a little laziness would be enough to send all my priorities haywire.
Can runaway Libby Cantrell finally get a new start?
Um, no guys I am NOT your mother and you can NOT come inside. And please DON'T cr@p on my front step......
Handbrake Turn a Car While Traveling Over 30 mph (50km/h)
Domestic hard coal consumption by EU nations through the first six months of 2011 was 64.9 million metric tons, up from 59.7 over the year-earlier period, and Germany was on track to import up to 48 million metric tons of coal for 2011- a total expected to increase as nuclear power capacity is phased out. Eight of 17 reactors have already been switched off and the nine reactors currently on line are due to be turned off between 2015 and 2022. One assumes that these will go only once the coal capacity is on-line.
after a while
Amgen Inc. 17
In ancient India, the idea of ahimsa developed, which means “not doing harm.” Followers of this creed believe that living in a manner that reduces the suffering of other living beings, including animals, is necessary to reach higher levels of spiritual health.
Anyway, after I got the needle to numb my teeth, I felt a little weird – as if I had just got a general. Usually I would have panicked but I thought “all I have to do here is lay down with my mouth open.” It would really matter if I passed out or felt funny. It all went well. There was nothing seriously wrong with any teeth but I do have to go back. I did feel a little panicked at one point, towards the end, when he puts a mould-type thing on my tooth to put in the filling. Usual feelings of fear and dread came over me but I breathed it out and just thought “well, I can sit up, have a bit of a cry, calm down but the job will get done either way - may as well just get it done now.”
Every year there is a group of athletes that have break-out performance. Some were previous disappointments who found their way. Some were no names who put themselves on the map. You thought some of them were pretty good but it turned out they were really good. Some just have a great story. Here are 11 athletes who broke out in 2011:
Iván Meade – How is the design scene in Saskatchewan? What do you like about it and what you don’t like about it?
Go to Custom Destinations (under the Tools tab) and create a new Custom Destination: custom-voicemail-retrieve,s,1 — then Submit Changes.
I hate him now. But back then the love always came back for him. Stockholm Syndrome? Everything makes so much sense now. I should have hated him. Despised him. Tried to get as far from him as possible. But I did not. I loved him. Until I found out why I loved him. Stockholm syndrome.
Tipperary song is still marching 100 years on ‘The Champ’ was a vital political inspiration Martin McGuinness changes tune about meeting the Queen Frustration growing as debate on Europe stifled Judge orders Boston College to turn over more items from oral history project dealing with IRA Hain reveals his tactics at the heart of peace process Police dismiss Duffy’s ‘planted DNA’ claims Sinn Fein leader requested a private meeting on the eve of IRA ceasefire Agreement with Adams over release of bomber Security fears halt Derry Fleadh bid
My last Doomcast(thanks for that name, kinda fits, in an opposite nickname sort of way), had a part at the end where I asked for ideas.
I used my Gypsy to make the base of the card and used strips of pop-dots to keep the layers apart so that the little leaves can move around when you shake the card.
bed.
5. People posting videos. Outside of reaction videos, videos on the internet are awesome. Especially music videos and clips of episodes. Quite frankly, since I don’t have HBO, the internet is the only way I would have been able to see the Renly/Loras scene from last week’s episode of Game of Thrones. And I get really impatient waiting for the DVDs to come out, since they seem to be waiting longer and longer to release them. And without the internet, I never would have watched Spartacus: Vengeance when I did, and then I would have been missing out on the pure awesomeness that is Nagron.
Hi everyone! I decided to write this (temporary) post about the barrage of emails re: comments that I think some of you have been experiencing recently. I was mostly offline these past days so I wasn’t aware of it until someone called my attention to it after she commented on my post today.
07-17 Detroit, MI – Fox Theatre Detroit
Here's a sweet picture Bev came across of our youngest grandson Zander (who is almost 6 now) enjoying a day of playing with Rikkers.
that i do
earthward again.
Warning signs of constipation:
Mo Hayder exploded onto the crime fiction scene back in 2000 with her fantastic début, Birdman. It’s sequel, The Treatment, was arguably even better. These were ferocious serial killer tales that featured cop Jack Caffery and were too disturbing for many readers but became critically acclaimed bestsellers.
But try if you like.
Our challenges will run 2 weeks, so every other Wednesday night/Thursday morning, depending on what area of the globe you live, there will be a NEW Challenge. You can use any images, stamps, etc. that you like as long as your challenge creation is NEW (no backlinking to previously made work) and follows our theme. You do not have to use images from
6) What is your natural hair color? If you dye it something completely different from what your momma gave ya, how come?
I can’t believe i’m allowed to be nominated… tears.
Sky and Tara share the same mother but different fathers. Sky is cautious, dutiful, marrying the perfect man, practicing her dream career as a lawyer, and raising their daughter, Rachel. Music is all Tara cares about until Aaron, a black rapper with a juvenile record, comes along. Tara gets pregnant in high school and runs away with Aaron and his rap crew. About the time Tara and Aaron’s music takes off and they are on their way to stardom, Sky’s life crashes. Tara attempts to step in and help only to be met with anger and jealousy. The two sisters, along with an interesting collection of other characters, spend the time on the road, and between gigs, trying to understand what it’s like to be the other sister and just what love and family mean.
Now that I think of it, I think the entire placement of the question has been wrong. We are quite into punishing both sides for acting harshly on each other. Instead we should put it this way: How much information outside religious texts should be let in our religion? Because right now, that seems to be the issue – someone used history to prove their point to pagan community.
It’s finally MAYYYYY!!!
Some cost-effective examples: three musketeers bar on their desk with a gift tag stating we couldn’t do it without you as part of our team or a $100,000 dollar chocolate bar –“your worth a million to our team or giving them a “Tigger” finger puppet saying you have the right positive attitude and energy for our team..
4.MAKE THE GLAZE: In a small bowl, stir the confectioners' sugar with the milk and drizzle it over the cake. Cut into wedges and serve.
*Should I capitalise?
Wisconsin’s 529 College Savings Program Director Jim DiUlio will be part of a panel discussion at the National Association State Treasurers’ Training Symposium in Atlanta on May 4. The session will discuss current news in financial aid and will be led by Jill Raynor ofNorthGeorgiaCollegeandStateUniversity, with assistance from Jim.
-Got all golld flags in every level (jumped on very top of flag pole)
Rnds 9-10: sc in each sc around (24).
Saturday – Yoga (90 min)
1. ALWAYS expect the worst. If you’re needed in the office at 9 o’ clock, leave the house two hours before. In my case, since I’ll be riding the LRT before moving to the MRT, I need to give more time for whatever unexpected thing that could happen i.e. train delays, technical problems like the train wouldn’t close (that happened to me!) and other stuff like too many people in queue that I should wait for the next train to fit myself into. Never underestimate the power of fate to ruin your plans. With the case in the MRT station in Cubao at around 7-7:30 in the morning, expect the lines to be very loooooooong. This post is not long enough to explain how long it could take. To be exact, they are not lines anymore because they go on loops and never-ending loops. There’s a line for ticket buyers, line for the entry gate, and a line before the train. You really have to allot as much time as you can, especially if it takes you a long time in the shower, dressing up, fixing make up, or eating breakfast.
In my search for the holy grail of products to keep my gorgeous (but oh so slippery) Armani foundation on my face for more than 30 minutes, I have come across a few duds – see my review on MAC’s Fix +.
And now I see so clearly. Sometimes... many long, hard years have to happen in order for breakthrough to occur. Sometimes the worst has to happen, before it can be better. Now I understand that trials really do have purpose. It is only through fire, that gold can be made so pure. Now I see that God's silence to us, doesn't mean His absence. His silence demands we live by faith. For it is faith that can move mountains! And when the mountains are moved, we can see the breathtaking view!
Yep, money is funny. It's also a little cheap, I think
Baldwin, three years after starring in My Bodyguard, is playing a character so bland and wholesome that he seems to be outside of the entire situation. His incredulous wide eyes and simplistic ideals belong in a different movie than one where there's supposed to be loudness and tackiness as the rallying cry. Unfortunately, he seems more like the guy who would clean up after the party, rather than the one who would join in the revelry.
fable of knowledge. One would like to know what things-in-themselves are; but behold, there are no things-in-themselves! But even supposing there were an in-itself, an unconditioned thing, it would for that very reason be unknowable! Something unconditioned cannot be known; otherwise it would not be unconditioned! . . . A ‘thing-in-itself’ just as perverse as a ‘sense-in-itself,’ a ‘meaning-in-itself. There are no ‘facts-in-themselves,’ for a sense must always be projected into them before there can be ‘facts’” (Nietzsche, The Will to Power, trans.
“It is only our policy conference that is going to bring some finality to the matter,” Jackson Mthembu, a spokesman for the ANC, said in an interview from Johannesburg on July 29.“Studies are being conducted. We can’t therefore jump the gun.”
As in that fleeting, shadowy, misty strife
“That’s better. Now tell me. What happened?”
Any funny experiences which informed this book?
My sincere wish is that Steve, the alderman, will live up to his word and restore the city in this time of loss. However, I have moved my shop to the St Vitus village to avoid any more insinuations of seeking power. My services are still available to those in the City of Dee.
…CNTRL & NRN PLAINS/MID-MO VALLEY…
James Bond jumps onto the Star Wars bandwagon when tubby Frenchman with evil beard Hugo Drax plans to flood the Earth with nerve gas while he floats about in a space station talking in a montone voice.
Blackhorns was not so impressed with having her photo taken!
From Diana Kennedy — her books and in-person workshops — I learned how to cook with the native foods of the Americas — squash, corn, tomatoes, chiles. And isn’t that what we are supposed to be celebrating on Thanksgiving? At their 1621 autumn harvest feast, the Pilgrims and the Native Americans probably shared those very foods.
It cited, among others, the trial of 12 supporters of housing rights movement Abahlali baseMjondolo on charges relating to violence in the Kennedy Road informal settlement in 2009 and the unlawful arrest of Sunday Times journalist Mzilikazi wa Afrika after his reports on an alleged hit squad linked to senior Limpopo provincial government members. Also of concern were ANC plans for a media appeals tribunal and the tabling of the draconian Protection of Information Bill. Amnesty International did not however condemn the well-recorded, ongoing genocide of the Afrikaners and the unconstitutional hatespeech targetting the white minority for genocide by the ANC regime.
What happens the next day? Do they turn anything in?
So next time, leave the Anonymous label to those of us who know what we're doing: monks and scribes and the odd medieval crackpot.
My latest project - The Garden Gate Mini Album: Asian Garden Gate will be going up on Wednesday. There will also be a Flower Garden Gate that will go up by late this week or early next week. Both styles will be included in the pattern (the pattern will also be available as a pattern only). Each Gate style
The point is that as born-again believers in Jesus Christ we have a number of traits in common. It is critical for you to embrace and embody these “I AM” statements. Because out of them and as a result of them will come your words and actions as individuals and leaders. When you do understand who you are in and because of Jesus you will be powerful and confident in all that you do. Why? Because you know who is behind and who is beside and who is in front of you. If I do not live from this foundation, I may be a leader but not a Biblical one. Until we (read that I) get it that I am created in HIS image, I am a son of the living God, I am loved and known by the creator of the universe, along with all the rest of our I AM statements you cannot live out HIS call on your life. Did you catch that? Only when you understand who you are in Christ, can you live out the call HE has put on you.
1/2 cup of toasted sesame seeds
His sigh pressed through me. “I know, but I don’t want to think about that.”
Fact; I don’t like crying infront of people ..
Episode six of RED KNIGHT-ERRANT a.k.a. RED HEROINE, the only surviving episode of the 13-part serial, is one of the few complete and earliest extant silent martial arts films.
All the employees were given these blankets that depicted the old Samaritan hospital and the new updated version. A nice keepsake.
Messenger and Advocate: An official publication of the church between 1834 and 1837 intended to proclaim church doctrine. (Note: The Messenge and Advocatet is no longer considered official or doctrinal.)
Ok, so it's not the tipycal apple strudel, it has vanilla wafer cookies inside (delicious), it was made with puff pastry and I think it was better than the one with phyllo pastry. My mom made it the other day while I was sleeping just the smell of cinnamon woke me up then I went to the kitchen and I saw it already done... that's why I don't have any pictures of the process but she told me how she did it.
There are no ATMs in Bahía Solano. Visitors must take cash, preferably in low denomination bills.
Question: Do you ever bring schoolwork to the gym with you? What’s your favorite way to get ready for a test?
After it gets ironed out, I go through the Porn-O-Scan, and cool my heels for ten minutes while they decide if they want to mess with my Glock or not. (Glock: The disposable pistol for travelers! If you wind up diverted to NYC you can just say "Screw it" and ditch the heater without regrets.)
Next I looked at the one-loss teams and tried to determine the best teams from that group. Georgia was easy, their one loss was to Alabama and they never gave up in that contest. USC, despite their loss to Oregon State is a solid football team. Florida’s loss to Ole Miss hurts them but I believe that they could beat any of the teams I had chosen and I am certain they would beat any of the unbeaten non-BCS guys (really, their schedules are abhorrent) and the same could be said for Ohio State, so I included them (their victory over Wisconsin helped them). After including those four I was left with one spot for twenty-three candidates. I watched Utah’s come-from-behind win last Thursday and I gave them the nod.
Well, it seems like that was a long summary of the last year. What's interesting is that if you have all such events documented in the blog, it then becomes easy to recollect those memories later. I have always enjoyed this journey with Coffee - Blog - Love - Hangout and I thank all my readers for the support throughout, and especially for reading this unusually long post. I should now get back to my experiment. It is already 108 minutes, and the eTomo software is still reconstructing the 3D electron tomograph image of my nanofiber sample. Cheers!
makes about 2 cups of tea
What we do need is a return to common sense, a return to honor and accountability and virtue and decency. We need to measure our actions against the Golden Rule, not use it to hit people with.
Elba: “Please Do!”
Japanese knotweed is an invasive species, but I thought its unfurling buds were very beautiful. Unfortunately this plant spreads rapidly and chokes out native species. It was imported as an ornamental in the 1800s from Japan. Maybe the side of it seen here was the reason why. New Witch hazel (Hamamelis virginiana) leaves and flower bracts from last fall’s blooms. It takes a full year for witch hazel flowers to become fruit.
I fixed spaghetti and toast. The spaghetti was tinned and had meatballs in it. The bread was frozen. It had to be toasted twice because the toaster doesn’t work right.
Did anyone else experience warm weather yesterday? Did you turn on your A/C? Sometimes it’s good to make sure it’s working because you don’t want it to be an extremely hot, hot day when you realize that it doesn’t work. Now, that would be the absolute worst.
Do you live in any of these places? Where are all the metal-friendly venues and easy women? Who has the cheapest booze? WE WANT TO PARTY WITH YOU. Let's make it happen!
Olive oil in the bath, or applied directly to the skin, is a great moisturizer and apparently also a natural healer (see previous MamaTip on the benefits of the oily olive).
Once upon a time there was an ad agency with two chief creative officers. They had two chiefs because it was a giant agency with giant global clients that proved to be too much for one person to handle.
And this was when my life was supposed to begin
2. I'm An Elephant
The path to eudaimonia is paved with decisions made with practical wisdom. The better your decisions, the more you will progress, the more of your potential you will use, and the more your life will flourish. In short, practical wisdom is the path to true happiness and satisfaction.
Wasserman-Schultz: oh bullshit Fluffy -
Next up… using a dropper of some kind.. I used an old medicine dropper, drop the alcohol onto the design. You don’t need to use too much and watch it spread out. We didn’t use black or brown, as I was already concerned that the colours would get muddy with the girl’s being so exuberant with their designs.
Unlike Israel, both Egypt and Turkey are extremely dependent on US made parts for their military, and it's difficult for me to believe that America would continue to supply them in a war against Israel, even with a President Obama in the White House. Also, neither can afford a war financially. Egypt is bankrupt with a population it can't afford to feed, and Turkey is sitting on a huge credit bubble that could burst at any moment. A war with Israel would also probably involve Turkey leaving NATO, since neither the U.S. or NATO’s European members would likely get involved in the conflict.
At the very least, whatever hot genocidaire-on-cattle action the Clooney UAVs capture on video is sure to raise alarms among the activist community. Even if those activists are just PETA. Beggars can’t be choosers.
Mom right beside him had her advice too
Once you go through the above…
Now, I don’t agree with that particular angle, but it brings up a certain point. Many women who train super hard, who attain that level of body fat, begin to stop menstruating. This means that their body does not have enough “stuff” to maintain all their functions, so their reproductive organs stop first.
So I'd tell Mainers to sign the anti-tax petition, then go home and write their legislators. Tell them that if they want Dirigo funded, man up and put it on the backs of all of Maine. Not just the people who like a drink.
He started in surprise as he noticed a small figure on the other side of the river, a young girl. He’d never seen her before. She looked younger than he was by a couple of years. She brushed her blonde hair out of her eyes impatiently as she concentrated on digging a rock from the shore. He sat back and watched her as the frustration overcame her expression. The rock wasn’t coming free, and she was particular about wanting THAT one.
Who cares how fast I am - really? Its not like I have a shot at winning a trophy or prize and that is fine by me. And look at me, my body doesn't exactly scream - I AM AN ATHLETE! I look more like a couch potato who loves beer and fries. There is victory in that I am exercising and I still can't believe in my lifetime I have completed 4 half marathons.
1 large Russet potato
So today is truly day one of Christmas break for me!!
the jump of least resistance
Mr. Campbell is survived by three children, Mrs. Robert Ousley, Alex Campbell and Norman Campbell Jr, all of Morven.
He tweeted: "KOLAVARI-D". Every one is praising the robes but the emporer is naked. Tune ordinary, singing substandard. words an insult to sensibility.
The Design Team have some examples for you, please check out their blogs for more info, links on left hand side :-
9 You've Got To Hide 2:34
Make tea.
2. JOY and PEACE adorn our living room...but they're ain't a whole lot of other decorations. Will we even get a tree this year? That is the question.
The only positive in this situation is that our ridiculous deductible has actually been met this year...which means that we could actually seriously talk about having baby #2 this year since the deductible wouldn't be an issue. Although, admittedly, there's not much of a timeline to make that happen. And I know it sounds a little crazy to be talking about having a baby in the face of all this, and I'll probably get a nasty anonymous comment saying "If you can't afford your medical bills, what makes you think you'll be able to afford another baby?!"
And finally, the super talented Alli over at Pease Pudding is having a Supperclub on Saturday 24 September, email her for more info! I have been lucky enough to eat Chez Allison, oh my goodness you are in for a treat at her Secret Supperclub, just dont say I told you ok?
Overwhelmed, I cannot pay attention to him. I resist her delectable pull and focus on him once more.
Circumstances seem dire when looking at Foreign Policy‘s map, and they should. According to the United Nation’s review of 33 countries with available statistics, the proportion of women who will be exposed to physical violence in their lifetime ranges from 12% in Hong Kong to 59% in Zambia. In a related survey, the U.N. found that nearly one-third of women worldwide agreed that being hit by a husband in an argument is justifiable, and in Mali, 74% of women say they believe it’s acceptable to by punished for refusing sex.
I used several different PTI sets to create this CAS Anniversary card. I started by stamping the doves from Happy Trails in Fresh Snow ink. The sentiment from Fillable Frames was stamped in Early Espresso & the heart from Sweet Baby in Cherry Cobbler. I added some sponging around the die cut Mat Stack to make it pop. Bakers twine was added as a finishing touch.
Total pregnancy weight gain: 38 pounds. I was shooting for 30 max, but hey, some nights I couldn't shove Monster Mix in my mouth fast enough. (For those of you who don't know what MM is, you're lucky! And better for it!)
There was no immediate explanation for the quitting of Khasawneh, a former judge of the International Court of Justice.
I am really pleased about this one, even though YA is not something I do a lot of. But here's an excerpt from my intro anyway!
Only if you both like Die Hard, Bruce Willis, or just action movies in general.
A majority of Senators and House Members from both parties have publicly called for swift passage of a robust proposal, and I urge Congress to provide the resources that we need to support these important programs. (Applause.)
Last week I had a dessert party at my apartment because a bunch of people were leaving for the summer and weren't coming back.. We had at least 60 people in our apartment over the course of the night. So. Much. Fun. I love these people.
I like to think that the little oak hasn’t died and is strongly growing, despite the trucks that rumble past it to deliver supplies to the hospital.
“A Separation” tells the story of a middle-class urban couple that is planning to divorce.
They have.
Sleeper Agent
Pocket does not accept any unagented manuscripts or queries.
The total price to install shelving and paint was around $200
Perhaps I take love a little seriously. But why not? Being in love’s the most beautiful feeling ever, even more so when it’s reciprocated. So my conclusion? If (up until recently) I was loved the same way I love in return, there would be no heartache to endure.
Our objectives are to:
Check out the vintage 80s belt! Each row of "scales" is sewn onto a thick fabric/elastic backing, so the whole thing is one big stretchy snakey...belt! I remember belts like this in high-end shops (like Suzy Creamcheese for those of you who are of that era), and wanting one bad.
What happened to your guitarist?
krisso
I doubt the historical links of the hall with music and Russia influenced ms Maer’s choice, but we were treated to Russian music. Ms Maer started her concert with Prokofjev’s sonata nr 5, op 135. This was followed by the more mellow Improvisation op 31 nr 1 by Medtner, while Prelude and Fuga nr 24 Op 87 by Shostakovich concluded the brilliant performance.
WFHB has a volunteer news and public affairs staff; reporting and producing several hours of local news programming each week. Even with a non-paid news department, WFHB has won more Society of Professional Journalists awards than almost any radio station in the state over the past few years.
I remember walking along Suffolk Street in mid October, a Saturday afternoon.
with torn-out soles, blacksmith tools, a transit
5. Basic books about Animals
Thanks for stopping by today. Have a great day. Make sure to stop by all of the design teams blogs and leave some love for a chance to win today's featured set.
You see, every stage in life up until now you knew exactly what was coming next. When you’re in middle school, the next step will be high school. After that, you’ll naturally go to college. After college? Well…shit.
The planned new movie – currently called Paul Raymond’s Wonderful World of Erotica – is based on Paul Willetts’ biography Members Only: The Life and Times of Paul Raymond.
At issue was the proper construction of the term "hardware error."
In the centre, meanwhile, is Peter Freeman's 'Spectra-Txt', a public art tower whose twinkling lights are supposed to be reminiscent of local boy Ridley Scott's Blade Runner, which was inspired by the night-lit refinery tendrils of ICI's Wilton site. And if you're really looking for some truly astonishing structures – if not 'architecture' as such – you're spoilt for choice in the long strip of industry that still stretches between Middlesbrough and Redcar. The fluted concrete silos of the Dorman Long works, the breathtaking (for more reasons than one) former ICI Refinery, with an excellent, Redbrick Modernist BDP office block as part of the site, a volcanic eruption of a Power Station, the monumental cranes of Teesport, and finally the Corus Steelworks, recently closed. Those who claim that Boro has no architecture may like to reflect on the enormous stylistic debt Modernist architects owe these places.
And the kids just couldn’t wait to get into the pool for a swim, and neither could I (mainly to get them off my back).
The course includes:
Thats it for tonight folks. I have a few things to add to my candy which I will show you soon.
PEOPLE provide goodness, kindness, and love.
I notice beaucoup homes with two front doors today.
- Matthew Giffin
Though those are awesome things to be sure,
I 'like' this month's Glossybox. I don't love it.
Then, I found myself horking down a nice slice of pizza while watching some sort of Iron Man marathon on TV in the middle of the afternoon. They interviewed one of the many winners of this marathon and I felt ashamed. First off, I didn’t realize that there are no losers in these types of marathons. There are so many different categories so that it works out that everyone gets some kind of accolade.
Julian Falconer, the lawyer representing Abouhassan, told CBC News that “in the face of denials by this officer and allegations that my client attacked, I think it’s essential that the public see this.”
Today I often hear and get criticized for the cost of purchasing real information that is based on factual data, experience based opinions from the knowledge of real-life scenarios gathered through first hand or what we refer to as primary experience. Data is the accumulation of information and in its raw form (that of not being validated and categorized for reasonable comparative value) is just a bunch of numbers. That data however when reviewed, researched, validated for accuracy and reliable categorical relationship to the context in which it is used, can become very powerful. In the hands of someone competent at understanding this data and having confidence in its accuracy and relationship to the context now can become information. Such a person must have normally a fairly high level of methodical expertise to then dub this data valid and factual. Now the next step is acting or interpreting information and making it work for the outcomes you seek or are being paid to create. That is where the application of such information and the directing of its use leads to experiences. Those experiences can have both positive and negative outcomes. When things work well we decide to continue the test and try again. If it works well yet again our mind begins to say this practice seems to solve this problem. This process of applying information and testing it gives that person real world experience in this particular subject matter expertise. The negative outcomes are weighed for determination of what caused it. Then they are retested many times with minor or major modifications until either it works well or just does not work at all. Now the person that has experienced both outcomes has a fairly well-balanced concept starting to form on what works and why and what does not. Thus their opinions form on how to avoid pitfalls and execute on opportunities with strategies that work consistently within this area of expertise. We call this background in the corporate world a “SME,” (Subject Matter Expert). Their opinions can be the difference between a successful venture or a failed one. Their time and knowledge can save hundreds of thousands of dollars and even millions of wasted dollars and can make their clients in the same vein millions and billions of dollars when executed well. This outcome is what we call wisdom. Wisdom of course is the most difficult intangible and hard to measure human trait of all. Those that profess or are acclaimed to have attained wisdom are held by those with the acumen to understand the difficulty in creating it from scratch, as wise and valuable advisors. Of course I am referring to the commonly called profession of consulting.
Rnd 17-19) ch1, sc in each sc around Fasten off
So if you are into finding internships, it's worth a peek, even if your not, I find it interesting...
akarmaṇaś ca boddhavyaṁ
She grabbed her handbag, and squeezed between him and the doorframe stepping into the hallway. For a split second she hesitated before glancing over her shoulder, and hissed, “Casse-toi.”
your carving for sugars since they are not loaded with calories,
I invite you to take a peek and follow Cottontail Kids.
Taken from 'Fine Fascination' (released March 2009)
arm
I've tried joining gyms a few times over the years. But, no matter how enthusiastically I try to approach it, "going to the gym" quickly becomes a chore that I loathe and resent. I just can't get into step classes or aerobics or spinning or even treadmills and weights and machines.
C&S: Your inspiration/role model/favorite cook??
I would like to thank everyone who has visited this site and all who have linked to it over the years. I'm happy that I was able to help more than 600,000 people discover quality music blogs that they might not found on their own. I have decided that rather than spreading myself too thin I am simply going to focus on the Digital Meltd0wn music blog, and run it to the very best of my ability. To all those who currently have a link to this site on your blog, I would like to ask you to please link to my music blog instead. The address is: http://digitalmeltd0wn.blogspot.com
Guess he will be sporting a buzz cut a little earlier in the season than usual. I'm pulling out the clippers tomorrow. Sigh! :(
No, I'm not killing him off, but it's still a goodbye.
SAN JOSE, Calif., July 17 (UPI) -- An official-looking car that once belonged to the Oregon State Police is roaming San Jose, Calif., with the words "Psycho Patrol" printed on its side.
I think that he is responsible for the ordering of the vEda mantrAs into manDalAs etc, that is for the organisation and preservation.
books (as if I have time to read)
1 lb pork belly (choose a piece with the skin still on if possible)
We ended up having our photo shoot at Golden Gate Park. Harriet was such a good sport because it was freezing cold and very windy. I was secretly thrilled to help tote around her ballerina shoe duds and got a peek at all of the stuff you have to do/wear with toe shoes, and now I'm glad I didn't get toe shoes when I was eight. It's a lot of work.
Physically, well, chemo has started taking its toll already. I feel dizzy and queasy most of the time. my body, which shakes with tremors anyhow, really shakes now. I'm always cold. and that is so unusual for me. so I have to stay bundled up in my hoodies and a special shawl that a dear friend made for me. I've started losing my eyelashes. yeah, it's weird. most people have their hair fall out first. for me, my eyelashes are falling out like crazy. they keep getting caught in my eyes and drive me nuts. some of my hair is coming out as well. I lost a tooth the other day. that caught me off guard. just a big gaping hole in the back of my mouth.....no warning whatsoever. just gone. and it's been one week....
16. Assholeparade - Just A Reminder
If you then, who are wicked, know how to give good gifts to your children, how much more will your heavenly Father give good things to those who ask him.
Because I wanted to be practical and not to have to renew the road tax and insurance by 31.12, I decided to place an ad in Mudah.com.my, half-heartedly expecting responses. (It is really hard to say good bye to 'a member of the family'...I wish I don't have to). But right after the ad was published, I started getting calls after calls after calls. Non- stop even until past midnight I had to silence my mobile. What nightmare!
We spent November and December jaunting up and down the East and West coasts. We spent January in Europe--our first time abroad together. Immediately upon returning we made a huge loop of the US over February and March. This included an exploration deep into the South, and a trip as far North as Montreal in Quebec. Traveling by car is not nearly as rewarding as by sailboat, and we are anxious to return to our preferred mode of transportation.
I’ll keep this short seen as it was a preshow match. Decent match here and a perfect warm up match for a PPV. Relatively short, with both men looking good. Miz did some nice stuff with the Cobra, big booting the Cobra itself. The Cobra recovered though to hit The Miz and hand Santino the retention. Ultimately, this was the right booking. Santino is way over while The Miz is above the US title now. Let’s just hope Miz can ‘use’ this to progress.
when my body feels awesome
And so the countdown begins! I am very excited about this game. I, as well as many of you out there no doubt, have been waiting anxiously, hoping for this game to come out and now the day is almost upon us! I have already reserved a copy of my own and just seeing the Diablo III title printed on a crinkled receipt makes me feel all warm and fuzzy inside.
1) sesame oil
And drowns what once untamely singed our souls.
Thank you so much for your lovely feedback about my new shop. It took many months to put together and your encouragement means a lot! As a way of saying thank you, I have entered any comments into a draw and the random number generated is 9 - Sarah B! Hooray, congratulations Sarah! Please send me an email when you have chosen your gift.
Big thanks to my Jewish friend Lauren for having propelled me into writing this piece… …as in this delicate minefield of middle-east politics, I feel as though I’m walking with two left shoes.
So I know I haven't done a Tuesday Poll Day in MONTHS! I should probably get a few of my readers back before doing another one but oh well. Since I did a post named Tattoo Tuesday this morning, I thought I'd do a poll on tattoos.
What we are likely to witness during the next two years will be repellent, even horrifying–but not necessarily dangerous.
Then D decided to one-up me and crack a rib or two a couple of weeks ago in what must have been a really spectacular fall in her laundry room.
After all, the UN is the bastion of human rights in the world and... what the hell, I can't even type that with a straight face.
PLEASE COMMENT WITH YOUR E-MAIL ADDRESS, OR A LINK TO YOUR FACEBOOK ACCOUNT SO THAT I CAN GET IN TOUCH WITH YOU IF YOU WIN. (If you don't want to leave your contact info, just be sure to check back on November 4th to see if you've won.)
I'm having a slow start today and that's okay. Sometimes it's a very good thing to not be rushing here and there. I have things I want to do today and things I need to do. One of those things is the library which doesn't open until 12:30 on Thursday. I wasn't able to take my shower first thing this morning as it was being used and so instead, I made use of my time by having breakfast and coffee, catching up on emails and reading the newspaper.
But where did we begin? 3 1/2 years ago we bought our 1971-flat-roofed-brick-house on a wing and a prayer. We weren't the highest bidders, but I wrote a letter to the owners explaining why we wanted the house and what it would mean to our family (I hinted at our family challenges early last year when I started the Blue Velvet Chair blog if you want to have a peek). It worked, and they chose us. We knew the entire house was due a proper renovation and a chance for a new life - it had a super solid foundation to work with - fabulous space both inside and out. Let's have a look at what it was like when we moved in.
Matthew Cowley – Down Jones Newswires/The Wall Street Journal, 04/20/2012
The current cast of characters:
3/4 tablespoons of milk
Gather the offcuts and roll to form a ball and then set to one side. It's best to then proceed with the remaining quarters of dough before moving onto the offcuts. This just means the pastry gets to relax a little before you roll it again.
Every day I will post a comment on the blog that is hosting the tour that day. The comment will include a daily word. You must write this word down. Because before I go to bed that night I will delete the word/comment. At the end of the tour you must have ALL 10 WORDS!!!
If I use 1/8 cup per load, I'll get 104 loads at .07 per load. Cheaper than my .10 a load for normal detergent BUT are my clothes going to be clean?
If there's one piece of advice I can offer about these events, it's this: stay until closing or just before closing. One, you never know when that last sale will happen. Two, your display will usually take much less effort to put up and take down than the other vendors. Waiting for them to start tearing down is a nice thing to do.
Anyway... I am now about 5 days behind on my blog so I'm going to cut this one short so I can do a quick catch up one. There is a rumour that we may get some coverage tomorrow. I am so excited!!!!!!
But, you forgot the tortured prostitute and the catacomb of horrors. You mention that in the first paragraph, then never again.
On Sunday we left the frills behind and headed off to the woods. Alfie Blue went to cosy up with the grandparents in his new Cone of Shame. Poor boy keeps chewing his hip until it bleeds so he needed a lampshade to sort him out. He seems fine with it on and best of all it means he can't lick his feet which he does literally ALL DAY (it drives me insane that gulpy wet lickety spit noise).
One lucky Table for five follower will win $25 gift card. Please go to Carolina Pad and tell me what you would get. This is the first and mandatory entry. US and Canada. Ending 12/14.
*Improve your communication and interpersonal skills
But just as you’re about
Complete coursework at your convenience on a previous work. Cell phones are a lot of transcription is greatly useful. In interviewing programmers, developers, professors, analysts and other vehicles fail to get you a start in an organization, such as are often processed in digital form - arrays of numbers that computers can store and process. As computers become faster and smarter, people have started using these machines to perform functions similar to that of web pages. Those with higher level degrees will often be intimately involved in software development which has grown to include some business courses along with your major in computers.
I’m back! And you thought you were rid of me.
It might've gotten louder as far as I'm concerned. I enjoyed It Might Get Loud but the film doesn't really deliver the goods. Ostensibly a document of a summit meeting of three well respected and highly influential guitar players from three different generations, the meeting happens but the three hardly reach the summit together. There is actually very little footage of the three of them in the same room and even less of them making music together in it. What little music they do make together is fine enough but it's not an especially inspired session.
My favourites shelf is a shelf of quirkiness. Inexplicably enjoyable, not sufficiently aligned to any one genre. The books that I remember most fondly are all a bit weird in one way or another. They're pickled eggs, well, some are gherkins or onions. Little wonder, then, that my first ebook, Peril, is undeniably a pickled egg. There's too much of me in it to be anything else.
things I spent time making didnt get used.
-Free parking
I have decided to call this challenge ‘River Cottage Rocks’. All you have to do is blog a River Cottage recipe on a chosen theme for that month.
Last I checked, Jason Campbell can count with his fingers and do coherant interviews. In fact, Campbell actually brings everything to the table that Al Davis drafted Russell for 3 years ago. He has a huge arm and a small ego. If Santana Moss actually kept his route 30 yards downfield, he could have added 300+ yards and 4-5 touchdowns to his season stats. Don’t believe me? Check the tapes. As a member of the live and televistion audience for every Redskins game last season (my wifes a ‘Skins fan), I know this to be fact. Moss put it in cruise control when he didn’t think the ball was coming. When released the ball, he downshifted and couldn’t catch up. If you wonder why Campbell overthrew so many receivers last season, try throwing a 40 yards bomb and trying to guess which gear the receiver wants to go after the ball with.
As you read this (if you're reading it on Tuesday morning), I'll be on the sidelines of our local swimming pool, cheering my son on in the qualifying heats of a local schools swimming gala. He was feeling really nervous about it last night but he took part last year and did really well, so fingers crossed!!
“No, just happy,” Rachel said.
Kendall is the one I’m thinking about this morning. That’s Kylie to the front left of the picture above (in pink), her sister Kendall next to her.
I of course had tears in my eyes, telling this story is emotional; it’s hard, even harder when it’s in front of a camera. You also have to guard your mouth; you don’t want to step on any toes because this is going on National TV. But the people filming where all so nice and during the breaks you could get a glimpse as to how the TV presenter, Matthias, is in real life. It felt comfortable enough.
The East London Business Alliance aim to strengthen their communities investments and ensure that the resources are going to where it is most needed. The East London Business Alliance understand the needs of East London and how their resources can best make an impact on the community; creating new opportunities and regeneration solutions for the various areas.
I had come across a copy of another children's book called, "From Little Things Big Things Grow" which was the song by Paul Kelly and Kev Carmody with illustrations by Gurindji children. This song/story tells the tale of the Gurindji people and their peaceful fight for land rights between 1966-1975 and I had brought the book up to Timor with me as I thought the primary school kids I was teaching might enjoy looking at the pictures done by Aboriginal children in Australia. As I was showing my kids the book, I started telling them the story of the Guridji people, their strength and determination and how with persistence, they achieved what was right. We spoke a little about the concept of "From Little Things Big Things Grow" and I went to put the book away to move on to other lessons.
Thomas Winship was born in Middletown, NY (USA) and still resides in Orange County. He holds an MBA in Management from St. Thomas Aquinas College, where he serves as an adjunct professor of courses in English Composition, Communications, and Business. He also spent fifteen years working for a global pharmaceutical company, specializing in organizational development, talent management, and training. Tom writes in his spare time. His first novel, a mystery/legal thriller entitled Temporary Insanity (a.k.a. Case Closed), was a 2008 finalist in a national contest but failed to garner industry attention. His second novel, Væmpires: Revolution, was published in October and a follow-up novella, Væmpires: White Christmas, was published in December. He is an avid collector of books, comic books, music, and movies. His interests are diverse: on any given day, Tom is likely to be found watching a horror movie, attending a hard rock concert, or enjoying a Broadway show. He is currently working on the next installment of the “Væmpires” series, which is scheduled for a 2012 release.
Most of these plants are native wildflowers that I've transplanted from our property to the house. I keep some of the plants covered with flower pots and wire enclosures until they are larger to protect them from nibbling rabbits, and with every little breeze, the silver 'fairy' bells make such a pretty sound. It won't be long now before there are blossoms to share. :)
There was a slight creaking from the wall. She put her dressing gown over the wall-mounted trouser press.
these bookshelves
Global consumers, merchants and wholesalers benefits from easy access to limited edition collectibles while advancing fair labor, sustainability and environmentally responsible principles.
The list of murdered farmers is available for anybody interested in doing the research.
Didn’t sleep. At all.
Sewhag said he would opt to field if he won the toss to avoid the problems the bowlers could face because of the evening dew.
The F-82 Twin Mustang Zero Sum Game — USAF wins and CAF loses and loses again and may lose flying their B-29
It's always a happy event to be in print again. And in Russia too!
I strongly suspect you will not reply in a proper fashion to this letter, if you reply at all. So I give you fair notice that until I am formally notified that the ban applies to my property and am provided with valid reasons (not indicators of your own ineptitude) I will not curtail my water usage. Until we can agree an appropriate reduction in my bills for the duration of the ban I will not curtail my water usage. Until you stop paying out bonuses and shareholder dividends (especially to foreign investors) and bring your infrastructure up to a decent standard I will not curtail my water usage.
Sorry folks… what you call French fries did not come from France in the first place. (They are a specialty of the Belgian cuisine.) When prepared in Metropolitan France, or in any French speaking part of the world, the preparation is known simply as “frites”… fries.
almost...
Saturday morning Amelia and I got to go wedding dress shopping with my best friend since 6th grade... yes 6th grade!!!I was super excited that I got the chance to go!! Sabrina is getting married in April and she didn't have her dress or bridesmaids dresses picked yet! Well we fixed that! It was a day to just look for bridesmaid dresses but I just had to see Sabrina in a gown. Much to my surprised we both kept staring at this dress another bride was trying on. So we pulled it and it on her and OH MY GOODNESS...... beautiful! She bought it that day! I kept telling her sister that Sabrina just needed me to make a decision! See, Sabrina had been dress shopping for awhile and nothing really sparked her fancy! I am giddy about the dress and a little jealous that I am not wearing it! HA ( I know... I had my chance but really the dress.... omg)
-Goose. Knows dirty girls.
And, with that, I think I better close down this list because it could go on forever. If I stick to this list, then I should have plenty of time left over to get my writing done.
startling against my cheek. How quickly,
The contest is open internationally for anyone to win.
99. Rubber bands last longer when refrigerated.
This charming guy was drawn by Emily. Someone I work with. During a boring training she started doodling portraits of the bored people around us. Afterward I asked if she would like to help out. She was part of my newbie group and jumped at the idea.
Putting Jane Austen (1775 – 1817) and Douglas Kennedy (1955 – ) together on one blog. Whatever is going on? How can this make any sense – putting an 18th century classical novelist alongside a contemporary best-selling novelist (even if he does aim to be serious as well as popular)?
1 cup heavy cream or milk
The Cherokee legends and rituals were very interesting to read about and the way Heather's weaved them into the story well, you truly do learn something new everyday.
About a half-hour out, we call Conch on the VHF and inform them of our position. They ask for us to call again when we’re in the road. Will do. As we enter the road we call again and they send a dink out with a “harbor pilot” to drive Kokomo to the fuel dock. It’s kinda interesting that they don’t trust their customers to dock/undock from their own marina but allow them to run free around the rest of the islands. Whatever.
four weeks.'
Copic Colours:
To love what God loves and hate what God hates is the very act of reverence. The fear of the Lord is returning to the House of God in this hour and with it, the anointing. Joy and celebration abounding!
Perhaps my eye is a lot more critical than it was twenty or thirty years ago and Whitcomb's house is very definitely of its time. Not that I wish to imply that for a house to date is a bad thing but there are some decades, being afflicted by extremes as were the 1980s, that have a very strong flavor and cannot but date.
The Power of ownership in leading today’s organisations. When was the last time you washed a rental car? Probably never!…because you don’t own it. In leading your organisation in today’s complex and uncertain world, would you rather have your people renting or OWNING their job? This session is about using the POWER OF OWNERSHIP to become even more successful in leading your organisation.
"The story of Scout's initiation and maturing is the story of finding out who you are in the world," says author Mary McDonagh Murphy. "And at the same time, the novel is about finding out who we are as a country."
Here’s a picture of her creepy Halloween bottle labels:
Five people were reportedly killed in a cross-border clash between Pakistani tribesmen and Afghan security forces yesterday (Dawn). NATO has apologized for the death of a 12 year old Afghan girl, who was killed along with her uncle in a night raid outside of the eastern Afghan city of Jalalabad (NYT). A man wearing an Afghan police uniform has killed an American soldier in Helmand (Pajhwok).
- Pour cake batter in a greased and floured baking pan, or non-stick pan. Bake
The best boundaries we can live by are God’s boundaries, not ours. But how do we know what God’s boundaries are? Who’s to say who’s right and who’s wrong, who’s in and who’s out, who’s free and who’s in prison, whose space is God’s space?
And the others chimed in, "We saw the star. We know we saw the star. If he isn't here, where exactly can we go to find and worship him?"
Doppleganger and Idle Worship (dir. Theo Stefanski) - These two shorts were nothing but beautiful. These were stop-motion animation pieces featuring a skeleton in some sort of desert wasteland setting either looking for others like him/her/itself (Doppleganger) or searching for something to worship (Idle Worship).
“Nobody likes to buy a home with something that requires big money to modify or repair,” says property investor Kamarul Ariff.
Lots to do this week! Opening Day is Saturday!
Critics of Verizon’s planned purchase of cable operator spectrum were quick to jump on the company’s announcement Wednesday that it was putting the 700 MHz spectrum it got in an FCC auction on the block contingent on the approval of the purchase of AWS spectrum from SpectrumCo.
The responsibilities and tasks of public relations professionals vary. Every day could be something or someone different they work with. Their job is to communicate a good image to the public for their clients. They do this in different ways through media, advertising, and other forms of communication. Their tasks also vary depending on what type of client they work with and the form of communication they use. The different types of clients that public relations work with include: non-profit organizations, businesses, companies, hospitals, universities, and other community organizations and programs.
just see la.
the worst in terms of training,
Crystal and I went to meet Kelsey this afternoon for lunch because Crystal knew of this great chicken place that we wanted to try. After waiting for Kelsey (who was late because she either slept through her alarm or turned it off in her sleep), we wondered around until we found the place. And it was closed. Well, crap. At 11:15, you’d think they’d be open, but apparently not. We then we decided to try another chicken place Kelsey liked in the same general area, but alas, that also was closed. Korea has the strangest times. Certain things open until 5 a.m……but don’t open again until past 12. ??? That is ultimately beside the point though.
Oh, Peter!
I did not hit my goal of 2,000 calories a day but I got close and realized that my trouble lies in what I throw in my mouth with out thinking. And portion control.
When I have finished speaking certain detailed announcements will be made on behalf of the Lib Dems. Give these your closest attention.
In a sober assessment of the report, Gary Burtless of the Brookings Institution suggested that these numbers are the bellwether of a slowing jobs picture in the coming months.
Enlargement: 5/5
Hello bloggers, I hope everyone is well. I've had a bit of a change round on my blog and added a second sidebar so I could do some tidying up. The header etc is different too but it won't stay like this for long....I was messing about with backgrounds yesterday when something happened to my blog so that I could no longer open it (shock horror!) and it kept making my laptop freeze to even try and open my blog. So I didn't get a chance to change the background to something more crafty. I'm too scared to touch it now in case it won't open again!
"Today is also the 41st birthday of John Pinkerton, founder and brewmaster of Moon River Brewing in Savannah, Georgia. John is also involved in Beer America TV. He also brews some terrific beers and is great fun to drink a beer or three with. Join me in wishing John a very happy birthday." (from Jay Brooks' August 16 post on Brookston Beer Bulletin)
Enjoy the sunshine, and appreciate that pint.
You left the world every which way.
Story time: the evil Doctor Who...no, not Tom Baker; this is a white-haired, leering evil guy (Hideyo Amamoto) in a black suit left over from Blofeld's last garage sale. He is hot to mine a radioactive element called - oddly enough - Element X. For what? It's not important; it's for evil world-taking-over purposes. In order to mine it from the frozen lands of the North Pole (presumably without Santa's permission), he constructs a gigantic mechanical King Kong to do so...because he can, is the best answer. However, Klang Kong (as I call him) is unable to dig very well (cheap Japanese crap) and Doc W's little helper Madame X (Mie Hama) kidnaps the real Kong from Mondo Island (not Kong Island, don't be silly...). So, a real ape to replace a mechanical one who didn't even work in freezing temps in irradiated conditions. Good job, X.
This week I read “How Nonsense Sharpens the Intellect” in the Tuesday science section of the New York Times in which Benedict Carey describes an intriguing theory. The idea is that when we come across something that defies logic or is disorienting, our brains try to make some sense of it by looking for patterns, and in that process, we may become more aware of other patterns that we might otherwise not notice.
- Shared Facebook wall posting.
chopping beetles by the thousand clean in two.
My plans for the day continued to go wrong; Janis had said we should meet in Lo de Celia, but we had arranged to meet Roger and Mirta at Consegrados. I checked the times and there was no reason we could not do the two especially as they were only three blocks apart. So I mailed Janis to tell her.
I worry that these are too slow, since I ran a 2011 half marathon at an average of 9:30 minutes/mile. I don’t find even the short tempo run pace to be uncomfortable. But RLRF doesn’t recommend moving up a pace bracket unless all three tempo runs can be completed “easily.” Since, I can barely (and sometimes not at all) complete the first key run at the 28:00 5K times, I’ve stuck with the that bracket.
Good day dear friends!!! Donalda here with you this week to bring you our new challenge. But i am sure you all would like to know the winners of last week first !!! Right??? Okay onto the 1st prize which was sponsored by Jacobi.ni with a 20 Euro voucher
That’s when my dad sat me down and, if memory serves me correctly, settled me down. When I was calm enough to listen he asked me one question, “Ask yourself honestly, did you try hard enough to earn a badge?” Those words cut through my heart like a sword and stung every bit of the way. It doesn’t feel like that when you have done your best, tried your hardest, and worked to earn it. I didn’t have to answer….he knew and I knew. I had not put my best effort forward. I didn’t push myself to my limits. I had expected to just slide through and not be penalized for it. I knew that I did not TRY.
One of my biggest battles was and on a certain level is reacting negatively when being criticized. While I’ve learned that this may be the price to pay with regards to personal growth, and as a result have learned to control myself and not “defend” myself and stay at peace. I still tend to keep my own counsel.
When her father’s called to serve in the Imperial army, free-spirited Mulan breaks tradition by taking his place. Mulan’s concerned ancestors send tiny guardian dragon Mushu to bring her back safely – if he can stop causing more problems than he solves. Eventually, Mulan proves her worth as a highly-skilled warrior, impressing fellow soldiers Ling, Yao, and Chien Po as well as Captain Li Shang. Soon, her true identity is discovered and she is sent away in disgrace. However, China’s future and those she loves depending on her, Mulan must find a way to convince the others that she has what it takes to be the best and defeat the Huns.
Each time you choose love over fear, you radiate courage.
Alan continued on saying that the energy of ease is universally available, but some people have found a way to access and use it.
…is really, once you get into it, about anywhere and generic terms quickly take over:
From ethanolproducer, concerning the infringement complaint of Butamax (DuPont/BP) filed in D. Delaware over US 7851188 :
US and UK flags – Eight years ago I moved to London, England, from Indianapolis, Indiana. This life change was the catalyst for Dark Parties. I’m now a unique blend of both the US and UK and wonder if it makes me misunderstood on both sides of the Atlantic.
at 579 (internal quotation marks and citation omitted, alteration incorporated); Davis, 246 F.3d at 174 (same). The test almost perfectly describes Koons's adaptation of “Silk Sandals”: the use of a fashion photograph created for publication in a glossy American “lifestyles” magazine-with changes of its
...That's what you want -isn't it?'
In the minds of many of those concerned about an imminent rendezvous with peak oil, the day the world slides past the all-time peak in oil production will be a fateful and irreversible crossing. After it all the calamitous predicted consequences of the ensuing decline will become obvious--financial collapse, unaffordable energy prices, shortages of food and other goods dependent on cheap oil, and mounting unemployment to name a few. And, the cause of these effects will be plain for everyone to see.
08. The Opposite of Hallelujah
which duly did dismember him.
anybody else having issues like this?
Witch-King: Crap, I didn’t think of that.
Rolling Stone’s David Fricke aptly described The Safes music as “atomic pop.” That’s what’s in store on The Safes new Sight of All Light EP! Five, frantic fits of extreme melodic energy thrown down hot and live, real and raw! With tunes that will slap you in the face and make you shake your ass while you sing!
Don't forget these great shops further up Columbia Street:
Album Number(TC Song #): TCAAR1068712
p.sThis week's YouTube-nominated freeze-frame is entitled, 'Non-plussed smile'
Unfortunately, the vocal parts aren’t as successful; Gilmour’s verses, though melodic, are far too wordy for the space they’re alotted and Waters’ performance on this song is at times cringe-inducing as he struggles to hit the notes. Also on the downside is the fact that some sections are performed at a lethargic pace, resulting in a bit of a dragging sensation. But those lengthy instrumental passages are absolutely worth revisiting numerous times!
9. A telephone system for facilitating a telephone call from any available telephone station, comprising:
Name: RUBEN HERNANDEZ MARTINEZ
Priorities are:
We then went down to the C.T.A lab to do some analysis. First we took a beer and de-gassed, meaning we shook it to remove the CO2, next we filtered it to remove foam. We then poured it to a special beaker and distilled it. From this we were able to find the exact alcohol content, and exact original gravity. One of the best parts was we got to use a density meter, which is a super nerdy machine that tells you the density of a liquid. We then looked at our density with a really accurate laboratory refractometer. This is quite the apparatus. It involves a water bath and different oculars to look at samples and it is all based on light refraction and liquid density. Last we took an extract reading with a really accurate hydrometer.
Chirp through gear shifts or just firm them up a little for towing or for track use- your choice. Connect to your PC via USB cable, and you can dial in independent upshift and downshift boost percentages (0 to 100) for each gear in both Dri… Read More >>
The first nine miles of the race were actually kind of nice. As I said before, there were WAY too many people, but it wasn't necessarily a bad thing, it kept me at a slow pace, as opposed to my normal sprint starts and subsequent dying a few miles later. And, surprisingly, I was able to run the first 9 miles relatively easily (HUGE shock, since my longest training run was only about 8 miles and it was the worst feeling ever).
It's entirely possible of course that the "80%...90% of everything is crap" formulae is just getting higher - yet at the same time we are being asked to buy more, consume more to keep the economy going. "More" in this case can include culture - whether its DVDs, cinema tickets, CDs or poetry books.
Today, freshly medicated and ready to kick these allergies to the curb, I’m determined to run at least four miles, lay off the cookies, make a dinner that involves mostly vegetables, and finish the evening with some serious yoga.
I cut out a felt mustache using one of the new CutUps Mustaches dies and topped with a festively colored sombrero from the Salud set. The “salud!” sentiment is stamped underneath the pair in red ink. I layered the panel on a red pinking edged circle for a contrasting pop of color.
Now timeskip to the 1980's, where Big Sis and Lil' Sis have modern-day doppelgangers called Park Ha and Sena. Lil' Sis and Big Sis are part of a strained stepfamily relationship. Big Sis Sena takes things too far when she tells the little kid to take a nap in a MOVING VAN and then lets her be carted away in said van, which is leaving Seoul and headed for BUSAN, which is clear across the country. We have moved beyond reasonable frustration and sibling rivalry into blatant psychopathery. I could punch Sena in the face right now.
likewise it's solidified my belief that parenting without punishments or rewards is not only possible but is the right choice for my family. again with the limits and boundaries.
Expected publication: April 24th 2012 US/ May 4th UK by Harlequin Teen.
Sometimes we grow impatient. We want what we want and we want it now. So we make the mistake of trying to get it by ourselves.
Transitions are sentences, phrases, images, and other elements in your writing that allow the reader to move smoothly between the emotions/meaning of one scene or chapter into the next one. Transitions, hopefully, allow the reader to get excited about what's to come, as well as let her absorb the importance of what's just happened.
It be pennies from heaven, for you and for me
Amsterdam is a great city. Truly, it really is. I can't wait to go back. Even if you don't, ahem, do anything...it seems that going there for a few days is enough to make you feel refreshed in a way you didn't think possible.
I needed to discipline. Stay calm. So thankful that they were able to get the groceries paid for and loaded into the car and not to have to abandon them in the store until a later time. So thankful that I would not be a momma at home with eight children and no food.
The latest in-print Phantom Sunday strip. Again, I'm taking advantage of the new format to draw some big panels. I liked the central Phantom figure enough to use it on the banner I recently had made for convention appearances. For the banner, I reworked the face a little. Smiling Phantom worked in context -- but for a promo image, I think he needed the serious face.
Picking the bobby pins out of my hair a swoop of wet locks fall on my face powdered cheeks. I lunge at the slippery strands. They are like thousands of strangers offering me an invitation to play. “Feel free to be as imaginative as you please,” they say teasingly. But it is the pink setting tape across my bangs that has me wincing at the frizz factor.
Rating : PG-15
Two, are you automatically patented -- in the patent statute, if you just sort of reduce this to a machine by adding a computer on at the end? They've flagged that as a problem. They haven't answered it. Could there ever be a situation where it doesn't meet this test but still is patentable? We are not sure.
this love
Or perhaps it is the other way around?
She looked into the mirror and closely studied her face. The mirror just looked back at her, staring straight into her eyes. “Who you looking at you old woman!” The lady in the mirror just smiled back. With much caution in her steps she slowly walked out of the bathroom and headed towards her favorite chair by the window, her old bent finger flipped up the switch of her radio. She loved “Prairie Home Companion” on a Saturday night. Then she reached into her bathrobe pocket and pulled out her mother’s old magnifying glass. She placed it against the face of her watch and slowly drew it towards her blue eyes. It was six o’clock and time for another beautiful sunset over Brooklyn.
I love Celebration, and this year it's tasting very good. I'm about halfway through my first sixer of the season but I feel sure there will be more in my future.
Yesterday was another day of shocking discoveries. Lets run through the list of fun stuff
Lean in close, because I'll probably be banished from the club of tough Colorado moms if I tell you this. I don't like it when my kids play in the snow. Don't get me wrong, I love how it delights them. I love that they exercise and use their imaginations and have fun when they're snowing it up. I love that they're tired afterwards. But I dread getting them ready to go out and all the effort it takes, and really loathe the pile of wet, soggy snow clothes that sits by the back door when they're done. I usually suggest 23 other things they could do instead of playing in the snow, before I finally give in. Puzzles? Legos? Computer game? Coloring? Play-doh???!?!?! (On second thought, choose SNOW, kids!!!)
Your pale head, as the arctic winds blow through my open door,
As an egomancer progresses in his or her studies (there are no restrictions placed on gender in the Heteronomy), they learn to trace the magic they sense in others back to it source, and if their own life-force is stronger, a magi can then use their victims’ own innate magic against them.
The tricky question is this: how do we keep up the level of interest we generated?! Ideas are welcome, but you know the best way to do it...keep asking for session beers from your local brewers and bars. Keep Tweeting when you find a good one. If you're a bar, please consider having at least one session beer on at all times, and if you do, get the sticker and display it!
“TEMPERANCE WORK. A society temperance pledge may be hung upon the wall, with the signatures of all members upon it. Plan for temperance meetings long in advance, and make them as strong as possible. Introduce into every temperance meeting some account of recent temperance victories, and the progress of the movement. Obtain addresses now and then from temperance enthusiasts. Learn what are the temperance laws of your own State and community, and how they are kept. How long since your town held a temperance mass-meeting? Plan one and hold it. Why should not the temperance committee learn, for the information of voters, the position as to temperance of the candidates before the people for election” (Clark, Christian Endeavor, supra, p. 584).
Kim and Janine supported Shirley in writing Sisterhood of Faith: 365 Life-Changing Stories About Women Who Made a Difference, which was released by Howard Publishing, a division of Simon & Schuster, in 2006. More recently the three women worked together to write another devotional book, Turning Guilt Trips into Joy Rides. They have spoken at women’s retreats and events in five states. All three women live in Millersburg, Pennsylvania. Visit their website for more info.
8. We need an accountant.
Challenges that I can enter this project into:
First Baptist Church Big Lake, Texas
“a time to search and a time to give up, a time to keep and a time to throw away,”
Lately, I've been spending a lot of time deciding just exactly how I'm going to use the lovely enameled poppies that Lynn Bowland sent my way a while back, almost obsessed you could say. In my notes, you can see poppies emerging from waves of green, adorning a vase, even used as the focal for a jaunty flapper hat like one I saw in the slide show.
And sometimes fries. Tonight I just HAD to have those J in the B 2 for 99 cents demons. I don't know why. If I was Catholic I'd go to confession. But tonight I also had to have their curly fries too. That's right, dipped in flour, with savory seasoning and that adorable curl. They are so so so good that McDonald's sugar coated deep-fried quasi-potato sticks pale in comparison. Seriously. You gotta try 'em!!!!!
Peacock Woman
I picked up this cute vintage bank a couple of months ago. I thought it was so cute.....but I did not have a white and brown spotted dachshund. It did not matter. This cutie had some crazing, but still had the stopper in the bottom of the bank, usually I don't find them with the stoppers, it was a good find.
It was hard to believe BP when it announced oil had stopped gushing into the Gulf of Mexico on Thursday, July 15. It had taken 87 days. There was relief but little jubilation: it will take many years to clean the shores and the birds, and for the sea to begin to repair itself from the onslaught of poisonous oil. Surely we can no longer call it a “spill”—it seems too light and trite a word.
Easy Way
There are the clanging chimes of doom
Our elf has been here for two days, and already I want him to go back to the North Pole for good. For two nights, I have jumped out of bed at four in the morning, because I forgot to move 'Zelfman' our elf. Okay so maybe it is fun for the kids, but it is just one more thing for mama!
And I'm crazy for love but I'm not coming on
Sorry I don't have any crafter's eye candy to share with you today. I haven't made anything for several days now (must be due for withdrawl to set in!). I have been busy with family over the Easter holiday, and I am busy making a Snorepro device for my brother who is visiting from the USA. Imagine how surprised I was to discover that he and I have virtually identical teeth! Who would have thought.... I guess that confirms we are siblings, so that's a good thing!
i) It means giving a multitude of different, sometimes hostile, cultures the same standing as our own.
So obviously, you need to pick your moment.
this may have resulted in your every available surface looking like Swiss cheese......
This is my entry for:
With thanks to Kerry Gold butter and Grand Velas for their kind sponsorship. I was truly spoiled rotten and my craving for Mexican food and Margaritas is sated for the time being. Also thanks to Kate Moeller for organising everything and always being helpful and patient, no matter how stupid the question. It was great to meet fellow bloggers, and to share their experience and to feel the comradeship of community and realise you're not alone in the strange world of blogland.
The girl said, "No!"
Those few weeks with Jude were absolute bliss.
Nearly 100 moms and dads participated; check out the links to all of their blogs by clicking on that handsome fella below.
Christmas in Canaan ... Hallmark Channel ... 2 AM
Yea John Tate,I can just hear it from an insurance salesman,”of course this policy in x years may not be worth the money you have put into it”,it’s rubbish,it was based on the rate being around 8.5,sure there were 50 reams of paper to go through with various rates but I bet nobody did,that’s why they were framed that way. Any salesman telling potential customers that they could quite easily lose their savings would have been out the door within a week,and you know it.
“How come?” I asked.
Someone once told me how to do just that. The universe will give us everything we ask for, she said, if we would ask the right way.
While she continued to perform after the war, the spark had sort of gone out, and her career was not as successful again. She retired in 1932 upon the death of her mother, without whom she was effectively helpless in show business. When she died in 1956, her good friend Mary Pickford was at her side.
Quick background on why the pic was taken:
Alphas: American Crafts
Air Special
NYX Narcissus 509 a vibrant cool toned true dolly pink
At some point I also realized I had forgotten the bird. All the pieces in this series must have a bird- it's symbolically important for the narrative. I actually did two birds. The first was a total fail; the second was okay, except for the color I chose for the lighter value. Oh well- that hardly mattered now, with the whole thing such a mess. What to do?
Albany Patriot
An expansive and elegant private Balinese villa awaits you – with separate sleeping, bathing and living pavilions and beautiful views from your plunge pool. An Indonesian spa. Dramatic hilltop and oceanside dining. All immersed in the mystique of this spiritual land. Experience the diversity of Bali by pairing your visit with a stay at Four Seasons Resort Bali at Sayan, an intimate upcountry retreat.
I know it’s mostly my fault; I gravitate towards the same things. But it’s also an adjustment to a reliance on the same ingredients (tomatoes! tuna! chicken!) and the inability to delve deep into exotic ingredients for fear of eating cow tongue or pigs feet by accident. (Note to self: langue de vache = cow tongue; pigs feet = pieds de cochon).
But I finally arrived at my mom's house and snuck up to the front door. My mom answered and motioned for me to go into my sister's room to surprise her. I stepped into her doorway and saw her standing by her computer. Before I could shout, "Surprise!" I heard a song playing from her computer that stopped me dead in my tracks... Sister by Dave Matthews Band. This song is so special to my sister and I... it has gotten us through many tough times. When I heard it playing, I thought my mother might have already spilled the beans on the surprise (she's good at that). All I could mutter was, "Whatcha doing, Sister?"
late afternoon I am walking
I also stole part of it from That Bastard From Bellingham. Dude has a seriously entertaining voice. I don't, but I did one anyway at the same site he's got a few on. Great stuff, check out the evolution of 1200 lbs. of Metal.
Voter turnout was about 37%, which means (if my math is correct), the "majority" of North Carolinians who support fucking over their fellows is actually about 23%.
In terms of how the different sources compile their statistics this is what each has to say.
* “Hollow”
What books/heroes did you like growing up, and how have they inspired you in writing this story?
Hannah :)
Now, the key to rocking your style, no matter where you live, despite not a soul dressing like you? CONFIDENCE! You can never have enough confidence, and the rockabilly and retro style is certainly one that demands it. Think about it – you have been confident enough to go against the grain of what all of those cookie cutter women are wearing and think is “stylish”, so go for it! Confidence is the final ingredient in any final outfit, and is what really makes it work!
Looks like
If this had been the work of a regional publication then I'd have simply shrugged my shoulders and said the writers should get out and about a bit more away from the confines of the M25. But it's supposed to represent the views of a national magazine that has a fair few international readers and subscribers. It is pathetic and hugely insulting.
- Charles Schulz Peanuts
To come back to science fiction and fantasy, we must consider that the human condition is one defined by conflict. If the speculative genres exist to explore the human condition in a kind of fictional laboratory separated or made distinct from our own society, then conflict–violence–is going to be part of that discussion. I tried writing a story in college once for a writing workshop wherein the main character simply wanders off into the woods and comes to a personal epiphany with some local wood sprites. The story was fantasy in a fantastic world; my professor (one of those specfic haters) asked me ‘why not put it in the real world? Why bother with fantasy?” I rankled at the question then, but I’ve come to look at it differently now. If all I was doing in that story was exploring a young man’s understanding of his educational opportunities, then fantasy was too blunt an instrument. I was tapping in a thumb tack with a sledgehammer–no, fantasy is a bigger, heavier genre than simple literary fiction. It is for exploring those massive issues which litfic need not or does not. These large issues are things that lead us to the mighty cataclysms of our species–war, violence, murder, chaos, anarchy, deep evil, and gleaming good. If specfic errs on the side of violence, it is merely because it is doing what it should and can do better than other genres.
For the first time in months, the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star stepped out in a skimpy two-piece to flaunt the results of her rigorous workout sessions.
Japanese researchers at the National Institute of Minimata Disease even claims that there is no cause for alarm because they have not yet found any cases of neurological methyl mercury toxicity; but several people and organizations point out several flaws in the conclusions that the NIMD presented to the public. The biggest flaw of all was that infants and children were not adequately tested for neurological impairments, despite the fact that scientists from the Faroe Islands found harmful errors in children due to consuming mercury-contaminated cetaceans. The Japanese government and its researchers are seemingly not taking the problem and the facts presented to them seriously.
Now for the slightly less condensed version:
I'm thinking, for example, of the questionable confessions contradicted by DNA evidence in the Yogurt Shop murders. (The Texas Court of Criminal Appeals' Criminal Justice Integrity Unit heard a presentation on the case at an event they sponsored to educate themselves and the public on the subject of false confessions.) How a DA reacts to exonerating DNA evidence tells you a lot about their mindset. They can admit a mistake, apologize, and continue the search for the real killer(s), perhaps even revisiting other confessions obtained by the same detective (in Austin's case Hector Polanco, who notoriously, tragically extracted a false confession from Christopher Ochoa as well as the Yogurt Shop defendants) or they can spin out new theorems about some unindicted co-ejaculator, a hypothetical fifth mystery suspect supposedly present with the accused but accounted for neither in the questionable confessions nor the prosecution's theory at trial. Grits was disappointed the incumbent at first chose the latter path before finally, grudgingly recommending charges be dismissed. Also, I've been dissatisfied that local jail diversion strategies haven't been more successful or always available to defendants with appointed counsel. I don't know that I'll agree with Judge Baird in every instance, but he has the experience and mettle for the job, and I'm confident he'd be more open to change than the incumbent.
The truth for me is hard to admit.
Up until now, I’ve kept my hype attacks limited to specific condo, townhouse and real estate ads. Today, I examine an equally important component of the condo hype machine: The media.
For the world's events have rumbled on since those gagged days,
What I'd like to do is go to each and every person that sent Terry Jones in Gainsville, Florida a copy of the Quran to burn and ask them what is the most precious book they have in their possession. No undoubtedly, many will say their bible but some others might mention a photo album or a scrapbook of memories. Maybe it was a book their read to their child or was read to them as a child. Books that have no replacement value but are priceless because of the meanings they hold. They treasure the meaning. I'd like to hold it.
Here it is--today's project, a Woven Ribbons quilt. Of course there's a story to this!
8. Brush the brioche with the egg yolk mixed with a dash of sugar. With a pair of scissors, make small cuts at the top of each ball.
Light is so cheap and easy these days. You flip a switch and brightness leaps to do your bidding: fluorescent, incandescent, LED, neon, halogen. Darkness has been consigned to the back of the closet, to the space under the bed with the dust bunnies. It comes out to roam the house during our sleeping hours, but it doesn't govern our waking ones. We can work or play games or read fluffy novels until 3:00 in the morning if we want to (or even later!), all without damaging our eyesight, because we have all the light we want at our disposal.
USCIS reports that during FY 2007, it received approximately 1.4 million naturalization applications. In the months of June and July of 2007 alone, it experienced an increase of nearly 350 percent compared to the same period in 2006.
Hopefully all goes well these critical first few days and dog number two becomes a permanent and welcome fixture in the family.
Conservatives also love to remind us of the intense scientific debate surrounding these issues, especially global warming. However, regarding global warming, an accurate depiction of the debate would look something like 97 scientists debating 3 scientists (who are often funded by industries who rely on practices detrimental to the environment). Most of the debate involves the quantity of change expected and whether or not man can reverse this trend. Despite which side is more right, almost all research indicates that mankind must pursue a starkly different approach to how we relate with the environment.
There was considerable growth in demand for energy-related patents – fuel cells, solar, wind and geothermal energy. Patent applications filed under the PCT System for those technologies increased from 584 applications in 2000 to 3,424 applications in 2009.
Yesterday was one of those days that I found myself in the car more than in the house. Between my appointments and errands, and the boys' sports and lessons, I think I drove over 100 miles between 8am and 8pm! It is on these kinds of days that I thank the heavens for my slow cooker -- without it, we'd be eating instant oatmeal for dinner (and don't think I haven't resorted to that!).
Between them stands, just about, the Leaning Tower of Pisa off which GG conjectured that different weights would fall at the same speed. When I was an Engineering student at Imperial College many, many moons ago my personal tutor was Prof. John Burland, who was working at that time in preventing the Leaning Tower from leaning any further.
their mouths agape. Traders throw up their hands.
I think Rashida's dress is beautiful.
N: I’m working on it….
How fast is it? Really fast.
The second issue is that Singer writes this essay as if he is so completely right. That there is no way you could ever argue with his philosophy or logic. He is so self-assured and, I suppose, that a man who has written so many books that are widely recognized and read and a man who has taught in huge colleges and universities, might have cause to feel self-assured about his logic and philosophies.
like this
5. How do you get yourself to feel better when you're having an "ugly day?" sometimes I get dressed up, do my hair extra special and makeup ad and sometimes I just own that ugly day stay in sweat pants and lounge around the house (in other words make it a lazy day)
It’s logical to think that by changing in some of those negative areas I mentioned, you are being light receptive and growing spiritually. Positive changes certainly are progress, but not to the degree you may think if you still feel fearful about personal or world situations. Spiritual growth is learning to live without fear, learning to fully trust the unequaled power of love.
Lola (5 years 10 months): Lola and Phoebe (2) accompanied their dad to Home Depot. While Dad was looking at outdoor ant sprays, the girls were monkeying around the riding lawn mower displays. Phoebe was on a Cub Cadet and Lola was on a John Deere model. Lola proudly proclaimed, “I’m riding the one where my Grandpa worked.” (#674)
icing sugar, cocoa or drinking chocolate - for dusting
Co-author of the study, Julia Baum from Canada’s University of Victoria says the human disturbances to reef shark populations are likely down to fishing — either incidentally caught in the nets of commercial or recreational fishermen or by direct targeting for their fins.
Now that I've had a small taste of trouble swats with hand,hanger or whatnot I don't know if I can confidently say I like to be spanked. There is a little feeling of dread in the moment of waiting after being pushed over. And a big feeling of relief at the end.
World Malaria Day is commemorated every year on 25 April and recognizes global efforts to control malaria. Globally, 3.3 billion people in 106 countries are at risk of malaria. In 2009, 781 000 people died from malaria, mainly women and children in Africa.
Long Lankin looked like he was going to transform into a creepy ghoul with red blood shot eyes, a green face and a hooded cloak that you could only see his face at the moment of his death.
Chicken Quesadilla. By far my favorite of all the flavors, had a nice smoky chipotle flavor with the black beans and colby cheese. Definitely get this one along with the beef picadillo. The Teriyaki Chicken looked similar on the inside, and I would say it was tied in 3rd place with the Buffalo Chicken one in terms of what I liked the best.
His mum, on the other hand, is not the shy and retiring type and has decided to publish his entry here on her own little piece of the internet for posterity ... and because she is as proud as punch and she can!
All they are doing is applying copyright law to protect their interests in the "intellectual property" they own.
Happy Wednesday everyone! Hope you guys are having a fantasic week!
4. Draw a picture of my colleague- a funny one. I drew her as a little baby sitting on a throne with a crown on her head, screeching and screaming and throwing her toys! It really helped me to see her more lightly and less as intimidating.
We went into a cute little store, Canterbury Home, a store filled with new and old items, and my friend and I spotted this at the back of the store:
(The one exceptional bright spot for Paparico's, however, may be its breakfast. I've not had it but I'm a huge fan of Mexican breakfast and I might recommend that if you go there at all, you do so for that menu as opposed to the lunch or dinner we had.)
And then there are the projects that I’m putting off for the sake of my grades and my sanity. I need to rewrite Save and Quit and rework Blood Ties (having ideas for projects you haven’t looked at in a while is among the best feelings you can have, as a writer). Save and Quit, I’ve been planning on revising since… well, since I wrote it. My plan for it now is to outline what I’ve got, figure out where to put everything, and go from there.
We're restarting the crazy schedule with three skating sessions and a tap dancing session every week until the end of June. It'll be a crazy blast and I'm not sure myself how I'll manage. Nevertheless, these things to get done and we will make sure to keep our chins up and keep the wheels turning over here.
1. Pretend that you are walking into the painting. Where would you enter?
Yes, you forgive them, as you have to, because you love them as they are a part of your family, but you never ever really forget.
I’m a white wall girl, through and through. Yes, the loft is a rental with soaring ceilings, so that helped cement my decision to stay white. But on top of that, I like crisp bright spaces that are speckled with color and pattern. This is what I went for in my living room: white
All of these questions will be answered in due time. The results of these questions will culminate in the Sixers record at the end of this 66 game season. Here is a month-by-month look at the Sixers schedule to see where they could possibly finish this season.
In Simonstown, the four brand new state of the art German MEKO class frigates are almost all laid-up and rusting away , rotating a skeleton crew to every now and again take them out into False Bay for a spin or to scatter the ashes of a former Admiral.
And several children.
A man of few words, Ivan suddenly has a faraway look in his eyes. ‘This coffee tastes like… the Camino,’ he murmurs. He walked the trail once, El Camino de Santiago. When Ivan does speak, it’s often about those days, when he was a pilgrim.
It really is a chair warehouse round here, and here you see 2 stools and a child’s chair that have been sitting around waiting for an attack of creativity…. All three are in need of repair… the wrought iron stool is rusty, the child’s chair is a horrible red with a cheap chipboard replacement seat and the wooden stool is a wobbly piece of kindling waiting to happen…. The two wrought iron pieces were $2 each and the wooden stool was a roadside find….. First step pull everything apart…. I then stripped back the iron chairs and undercoated twice, sanded a bit more and top coated twice… The wooden seats were sanded back, tweaked, swapped and oiled….
Zombie Tag is about decisions. It is about right ones, wrong ones, and dealing with the ones you have made. For that reason I believe anyone can benefit from reading this story. You can't go wrong here. The characters are so true to what children are and what they believe. Though Zombie Tag deals with many BIG issues some parents try to hide from their kids, I believe the story deals with them in a way children can understand.
I circled around again. This time, I noticed knots protruding out as if it were branches trying to begin but, forbidden to form. I felt restriction. Somehow I knew this tree had been forbidden to grow the way it had intended and I knew it was because of the influence of man. My fingers continued to skim the bark bit by bit noticing every detail. Lovers had etched their initials in the trunk professing their love for one another. Inch by inch, carving by carving until there was little space left for the tree to just be a tree. The old man pointed to the branches that were so heavy they dipped down to the ground. I walked over to one and placed my hand on it only to find the same. It too was covered in carvings from star crossed lovers. This poor tree I thought to myself. One of the lower branches had small branches protruding out as if to hold the branch up. How touching and intelligent of this tree to offer such help to itself.
Medical Service
The tree-lined path twists its way uphill bringing me to St Mary’s Church at Lawford. Standing in a somewhat isolated spot, the church was built to serve neighbouring Lawford Hall. Now Grade I listed, the church is built in a variety of materials – brick, stone, flint, with a clay tiled roof – reflecting various alterations and additions over its 650 year history, originally having been constructed in around 1340 by the Lord of the Manor, Sir Benet de Cokefield. The Chancel – the oldest part of the church – consists of pointed stone-arched windows and walls of brick and knapped flint, part chequerboard, part coursed, and well weathered statuary in niches to the buttresses. In contrast, the walls of the Nave are rendered. Above, the roof is of clay tiles, but that part over the Chancel features diagonal diapering in a slightly lighter coloured tile. The bell tower is a curious mish-mash of dressed stone, brick, flint,and puddingstone. The fabric of the building exhibits so many different styles, it’s almost as if each successive builder deliberately ignored the style adopted by his predecessors in order to leave his own individual mark.
The play stations are my second hypothesis. Cleverly place in areas around the downstairs of our home, they all seem to include a variety of toys, stuffed animals, and housing units such as laundry hampers, dollar store baskets, or old lunch boxes for small toys and pieces to be tossed in during clean up time. When she's on her own, Amari is quite content to play with the toys and books she loves most or the ones closest to the surface of the toy receptacles. As a result, some things remain buried in the depths until curious friends up end the containers or conjure buried items from their graves with willful little arms.
If you have Smiley Cards, check out the cards and envelopes available on this cartridge, lots of options. There are also a bunch of cute phrases on this cartridge.
Sometimes a teacher chooses between honesty and kindness. Even if you accept that your standards may be flawed or your expectations erroneous, the paper before you seems unsatisfactory and, to be true to yourself and what you feel you know, you have to criticize.
Read your article aloud. This will help you determine whether your sentences are balanced, or not; your construction difficult to comprehend, or mellifluous.
The goals of van Persie have encouraged this challenge and that hurdle is the biggest obstacle to overcome. Yet there is no guarantee that the Dutchman will continue in this form either. We take such matters for granted, often at our peril. At times this season, goals have been hard to come by when the captain is not scoring. It is a wider issue that needs to be addressed in the transfer market and training pitches.
First the conversation between the Grandchildren:
I flew out early this morning and arrived at Stuttgart airport just after lunch. Unfortunately only one of my cases made it on the tight connection in Amsterdam - luckily it was the one with all the samples in (or unluckily you could say, as I could have easily made a few extra samples this evening if need be, I can't muster up my makeup bag and hairbrush! So fingers crossed the bag comes in on a later flight this evening otherwise I'm not exactly going to be looking my best tomorrow!)
FUCK!
Let me know your thoughts.
Track List:
I was at a work function. By which I mean, I was on a table in a juicer, showing the locals how to moonwalk fucking properly, while everyone else was in some conference centre next door, listening to the MD announce something about parking spaces or whatever or something or whatever.
I've wanted for a couple of years. Tracy came
That’s not to say that this novel was without its faults, though. My own novel focused on a young woman’s journey into the BDSM lifestyle, but it’s supposed to show that that’s a perfectly reasonable lifestyle to choose, and she eventually realizes that she can be a strong, independent woman and still make the choice to be a submissive. This novel, on the other hand, seems to focus on how this is a crazy lifestyle that only people with troubled pasts choose. We don’t fully understand what all has happened to Christian, but we know that he hates to be touched and had a very bad life the first few years of his life, and that he has always felt out of place with his “perfect” adoptive family. He turned to this lifestyle after having an affair with a married woman when he was 15 because this was the only type of “love” that he found “acceptable.”
The fighting took place in the same Jogi area as clashes that killed six soldiers on January 25 in the district of Kurram.
Read this passage slowly: Isa 49: 15-16
There will be some that might argue that the year 1998 was a temperature anomaly. Indeed, they would be correct. But the elevated temperatures observed that year were used to drive fear into the hearts of many people that the Earth had finally reached a tipping point and this was proof-positive that man-made global warming was a hard fact instead of just a hypothesis based on untested (unvalidated) computer models.
Les nouveautés seront disponibles vendredi 3 février à partir de 5h du matin, heure de Paris! Et comme toujours, faites un petit tour sur le blog d'All That Scraps, pour essayer de gagner:-)! Bisous et merci de votre visite! A demain:-)!
Sometimes I wish all of us depended on the human in us and on our personal values to decide how our world can be without waiting for anything to be enforced on us.
How to beat this: Be prepared with Surgical Extractions, Nihil Spellbombs, and counter spells. Obilvion Rings seem like a good way to stall them too, and Grafdigger’s Cage is a must!
Sultan Ibrahim said these would be demolished and the traders moved to a better place where cars would no longer be parked haphazardly and cause traffic jams.
In deep abasement bending;
Word to the wise. If you are over 6'6" tall. you won't fit on the stage at The Brief! There is fortunately a little oversized are of the stage that justs out beyond the low roof so you can stand there, just don't try to run and speak to your drummer :-)
Hi! I’m Jenny Ebert. I am a Lifestyle and Wedding Photographer based out of NYC. When I’m not taking photographs I spend most of my time doing a never-ending list of projects. Thanks to my stylishly chic and oh-so-fabulous Brides (and possibly my little obsession with all things wedding) the inspiration, ideas and projects never seems to cease. More to come, very soon.
The action of this apparatus will be readily understood. From the vertical shaft motion is communicated to the rake shafts, and a slower motion to one of the shafts carrying a pinion gearing into the circular rack. From this shaft a still slower motion is communicatcd to the other short shaft, carrying a pinion gearing into the rack, the two shafts being geared together by wheels of unequal sizes. It will thus be seen that when one of the rack pinions is thrown into gear with its shaft by means of its clutch, the whol apparatus will be made to travel slowly round the mash-tun, and the rakes will thus be brought to bear upon the whole of the “goods.” The direction of the motion of the apparatus, and the speed at which it is caused to travel, will depend upon which pinion is thrown into gear. This arrangement of travelling gear is similar to that adopted in the case of the chain rakes already spoken of.
Golden State Warriors vs Los Angeles Clippers 10:30 ET on ESPN
5. Star Wars: Episode 1
Atelier Iris also deserves credit in terms of throwing out alchemy as a new addictive source of obsessive compulsive gameplay and starting and few series that have made it big here in America, such as itself and Ar Tonelico. While I still believe the best of the AI series is the second, the first deserves credit just for these reasons alone.
I’ve renewed my heart; fuck going back to the start
Congratulations Kate of downrightcrafty! Please contact Trish (details in the sidebar) to arrange for delivery of your fabulous prize.
01 Dogs
Since I couldn't decide which one I liked the best…I let fate decide…….all the names in the pot……
I decide that, as she is out of the vehicle already, the best thing to do is to scoop her onto the stretcher and carry her back on to the road, where it will be much easier to assess her. A couple of minutes later we are by the ambulance; lots of space and lots of light. Also, being on the stretcher means she is at a much better height for me to examine her.
So I just snapped the nearest things to me and what do I get? A glitterball stood in a souvenir ashtray of the Demon of Lanzarote, a miniature coffin and candy ghoul left over from Hallowe'en, an Art Deco candle-light, a small eyewash bowl that actually contains my other half Madam Arcati's crown that fell off and is waiting for the dentist appointment to put it back, and an "amusing" beer-mat with a picture of a cat dressed as Lady GaGa.
Legal and accounting support from Arthur Cox and KPMG will help put participating startups on a solid footing. And at the same time The Irish Times will provide marketing support, services and facilities inside The Irish Times building, and a modest stipend provided by Enterprise Ireland. Each startup selected to participate in The Digital Challenge will also get to pitch to tech media and investors at the next Dublin Web Summit in October.
Judi Dench (Mrs. Brown)
3 cups shredded Gruyère cheese, divided
Renew America.com
I’m no different. Ninety-five percent of my Ipod is filled with hardcore rap. The other four percent is good music from other genres and artists I enjoy. But there’s that one percent that even makes me wonder sometime, “Why is this on here?” Skeletons in my Ipod will take a look at my embarrassing songs.
b) "The inventor of the concept of cities with special laws designed to spur the lagging economies of failing states talks about the latest attempts by the Free Cities Institute to found a charter city in Central America."
The good news is that the SUN has been shining so it isn't the typical gray, but still! I'm getting OLD because none of this interests me!
and he immediately texted back with the word "TRACTOR" ...
But the gravy train doesn’t stop there. Once a year we get a listing of the Register of Members Interests. This shows the headings under which other income is earned by the TD, though not the amount. So we learn for 2010 that “other income” included that for speaking engagements, property rental, accountancy, farming, auctioneering, architectural services, legal services, directorships of commercial companies, funeral services, insurance and financial services, newspaper column-writing, plant hire, road haulage, hardware stores, pubs and bars. Ned O’Keeffe declared occupational income from “growing grass” but that was probably in a livestock agricultural context. Where do they get the time you might ask, isn’t the job of public representative demanding enough? And on top of that, those on leave of absence from public sector jobs may not receive “remuneration” from their original role, but they do receive pension entitlements, and some TDs even get ministerial pensions and severances. But three things about the Republic’s register of interests – one, it doesn’t show the amount of income earned outside the Dail, two, it doesn’t show hospitality though it is supposed to show travel facilities and gifts and three, it is produced once a year three months after the year end. In Northern Ireland, a similar register is updated almost monthly and contrast the information given in Northern Ireland with that in the transparency backwoods of the Republic – income details, hospitality and even family members benefiting from their position.
2) College information to help make the final decision for the next chapter of our oldest son's life
there is no escape if one exists
Another design team member will be debuting her own stamp line with a major manufacturer at Summer CHA!
7. HIPPIE. Most people who go vegan or veg is because they want to be more environmentally friendly and save more grain for actual people instead of feeding it to animals so we can eat them. They shop at thrift stores, eat vegan, speak to others about their decision, are peaceful, and live more simply. So yes, I suppose people call them hippies. You know what? It has never been bad to be a hippie. I may be a hippie, but I don’t care. If I know I’m taking care of my body, I don’t care what others label me.
I have published a sort of "best of" collection of posts which has been possible thanks to Amazon rolling extending their kindle market by opening a UK store. The book is quite literally a collection of posts from over the twenty months this blog was up and running; it will not be to every one's interest but if it is to yours please check it out on Amazon or click on the widget.
I pushed the comforter away from my face. Then I realised that I was still in the same dress as the evening before.
His voice is calm as he responds, "So I googled it and well, it can cause anal leakage."
I am in love with this color as an accent and I want to do some wall art similar to the one shown in this picture. I don't have a before pic of my bath, but that will come sometime down the road,
he takes his job as our provider very seriously.
Hood chuckled to himself as he recalled the incident. His father had been a hard man but a good man and a wise one too. Now, as the elder statesman of this fast-growing camp, Hood only hoped he was half as wise and half as good. He was certainly at least as disciplined and tough as his old man had been.
I should have dropped what I was doing and given the woman a hand as she made her way across the parking lot. I should have made plans to go back to the retirement home to spend a few hours of visitation. Like you, I probably won’t make it back until Christmas. I have places to go and things I have to do.
A wonderful observation I made yesterday is that it is extremely easy to breathe out slowly and rythmicaly when I am singing., especially carnatic music where the notes and rythym are so well designed.
October: Mark Twain
One single, deceptively simple idea that would vastly improve medical care in this country by immediately streamlining all medical communication:
There was still one more Sugarcubes album to be made according to their contract. Recording commenced in May of 1991 in a studio in Woodstock, New York. Björk tried to get her electric ideas across, to little avail. The recording process was a tiring chore and after the album was finished, Björk decided to quit the band. However, she agreed to do a few promotional tours beforehand. ‘Stick Around For Joy’ came out in February 1992 and included still more happy pop, with one of the songs, ‘Hit’, sailing to #17 on the English chart, matching Mezzoforte's chart success of 1983.
Here are some links to organizations that have our support. Will you consider supporting one?
a secret burial done in haste.
Merlin
He said South Africans could forge unity and build a better society if all communities correct the false history that was written by the country's former colonisers.
Since my camera didn’t work, I have no picture for you. But here’s Mel, the super-cute mascot.
Just put enough balls on and pretend and you really CAN do anything.
That alone is heart wrenching. The year is 1963 a young nineteen year old girl forced to wear a fake wedding ring, to go alone to a convent run by so called ‘women of God’ (which made me seriously consider why people don’t think religion is about power), to endure a horrendous labour with no comfort and no idea of what was going on, then to fall in love with her perfect little boy Paul only to have to give him away and why? To avoid stigma and ultimately to make sure she did not disgrace her family in the eyes of the Catholic Church. Although Angela forgave her mother and step father (after the death of her own beloved father passed away when she was just 14) knowing and repeating throughout her story that it was the way of the time, something that was done and she felt lucky
Many small space dwellers need to be thoughtful and edit their accents to create a harmonious home. This can often be a struggle since there are so many amazing furniture and decor pieces in the marketplace. What are your best tips for editing a space and what are your suggestions for when you "have to have that new item" in an already full space?
What I ask now is for your prayers. We are fine, but we're hurting. Please pray that my body rids itself peacefully and with minimal pain, pray for NO infections and a full healing. Also pray that we will know when to seek medical help. Pray that my body will then get back to it's normal cycle and that we can begin trying to make a baby. Pray that these scars, that are now on my mind and heart, will be erased and I will go at this with reckless abandon knowing full well that God is with me, not against me. Thank you again for your support and love.
But there's gonna be a meter on your bed
This much said, Miller is an engaging, innovative figure who just might be a herald for a better future. And The Parallel Community explores ideas that definitely need exploring in a world becoming increasingly hypnotized by the dimly lit menus of iPods, BlackBerrys and other techno-gadgets.
Next I need to figure what I'm gonna make for Christmas presents. You know, in case I actually send them out this year............. yeesh.
Pull-string piñatas are becoming more and more popular because they are easier for young children and can be used indoors. I like them better because no one accidentally gets whacked with a bat!
But all I can think is did these people think that low of that they thought I could'nt co-exist in the same breathing space as another?
Here's a few of my pepper plants. I actually have a whole flat of various types of peppers that I started from seeds that I'm still waiting for them to grow big enough to transplant. They're slow for whatever reason...but are growing. I planted a lot of bell peppers this year, so that I can put them up in the freezer and have peppers ready to cook with the beef that we'll have when we butcher Baby Bolt later.
stumbled into my room around 4 AM, but not before I scared the heebie
"Critical" to look at else who she identified: fourth person, used almost same language as was done with Dave Evans--but no follow-up on the fourth person ID'd.
Maeric and Joone, call signs Ares and Artemis, both launched from the bay. Their sleek Mark VII Vipers shooting out from the belly of the massive Orion. They curved starboard in unison, as Nike and her Raptor headed for a higher vantage from the opposite side of the ship.
2. I believe it’s more important to enjoy what you’re doing in life than earn a huge amount from it.
We can hardly breathe under this rain that has drenched us in an instant.
Now, considering that the Book of Sirach might be written thousands of years ago, it strikes me that technology might have evolved to the highest level we've ever seen, spaceships are being launched to explore the universe, but basically human's personal problems and feelings are the same, now or thousands of years ago. We feel happiness, sadness, elation, disappointment.
*Ink: VersaMagic Agean Blue
After lunch, one group preferred shopping while the other preferred sightseeing. The shopping group went to Beijing Street while the rest of us (including me) went to Shamian Island. Very similar to Georgetown in Penang. Then off we went to our next stop Flower City Square. Wow! nice buildings!!
Don’t forget to vote in the Bloomingdales Big Window Challenge!!!! Please think about voting for Eddie Ross and Elle Decor’s window. This is how Eddie’s window looks from the street. It’s an amazing room, anchored by fabulous blue and white splatter wallpaper set inside blue molding. There are two other contestants, but we’re pulling for Eddie here. To see all three rooms – go HERE.
This is the tunnel I want to do alllll the way down our 100 yard drive way - Neil vetoed that idea.
*Traditions of slavery may have changed, but slavery most certainly still exists.
‘No, since when any of us plays too regularly the other one will seize the chance to exploit this order. And when the game becomes too chaotic the chaos itself will become a player we will play against.’
The recipes are super easy, very healthy and really don’t take long at all to prepare. Whether you are a veteran chef or a rookie like me, you will enjoy these healthy recipes for your family.
Before getting onto 13-14, Laura pointed out again in 12.35-38 another instance of ‘elective’ esoterism – the books are to taught to the wise only. This gives further credence to the idea that pseudepigraphal/apocryphal texts are secondary; they are read only once you have read and understood the Hebrew Bible, not as an alternative to them. While they interpret the Scriptures in very interesting ways, they do not replace them (Hindy Najman and J.H. Charlesworth have both written on this issue). Laura says this is not counter-establishment literature; rather, it is itself establishment. Finally, Ezra is not characterized in this passage especially as a priest, rather he is more like a scribe, prophet or rabbi.
ShopNBC ended fiscal 2011 with $35.1 million in cash and restricted cash, which is an increase of $2.4 million during the quarter, reflecting positive operating cash flow in the quarter.
The story is basically all about Abby Jenson (Debby Ryan), who gets everything she wishes for on her 16th Birthday, and when everything she thought she ever wanted... Money, Car, being Grown Up, too... all starts to come true - she decides that she would much rather have her life and family back and just be 16 !
Destructive disillusions,
As the war wound down, most of the WRs wanted out. They needed clerks to handle the return of thousand of Marines coming back, so I shipped over for another ten months. After I got home, I joined the action reserves. 1950 rolled around with the “police action” in Korea and our unit was called up. I was newly married and I didn’t want to go. I finagled a medical discharge. My husband walked with me when I signed out so I wouldn’t change my mind when they played the USMC hymn.
It’s not often that I get out to nightclubs nowadays. Quite apart from being a dad, and being on the wrong side of 37, I don’t much like to suffer the indignity of clearly being the oldest person in any given room.
Thanks for spending a few minutes with me. OH! that pic to the side over the ottoman was what i used to have over the fireplace. it was nice too but I love change things up around here. Much to hubby's dismay.
Sometimes we will have an adult walk up to us and ask, “who we are and why are we here?”
I just finished the A-Z blogging challenge-- the second time in two years. I wrote 26 stories, more or less in 26 days, well about 26 hours, if I'm to be honest. Being me, I winged through all of it, without any pre-planning.
Jabbar the Powerful is one of the characters from a Moslem series called The 99 that will soon be shown on British TV. Each Islamic super hero(don't make me laugh) possesses one of the Paedophile Allah's 99 attributes.
Maybe the 'one' is not
Digital marketing made no difference either.
Obama is now being touted as an extreme liberal. And I do see some policies that raise my eyebrows. (Raising the cap on FICA taxes, for instance, which could put a serious chill on small businesses.) But when compared to Clinton, the gap between them seems larger than the media is touting. Clinton has this idealistic and naïve zeal, a la Lyndon Johnson, towards a society where the government takes care of everything. Obama seems to recognize the reality of the issues. Hence, if you don’t want to pay in to the federal health care system, in Barack’s world you don’t have to (unless you have children). And don’t come crying when you’re sick and can’t afford to pay, either.
Finally... People fed, things straightened up, headed to work on stuff for my trip AND... DH calls and says, "go getcha cow across the road from the neighbor's house..."
Outkast - Rosa Parks
My critique partners told me their thoughts on my story and I swear, I was so nervous, I didn’t hear a word they said. The next day, I got out the comments they made on my manuscript and reviewed them.
1/2 Cup melted butter
Wild River features six regular beers, including a German Hefeweizen brimming with clove and bubble-gum notes, an award-winning Kölsch, a hearty, stick-to-your-uvula Russian Imperial Stout and a slew of seasonal varieties.
“She’s still attacked by the nodding syndrome. She does not miss a day but the impact is no longer as serious as it used to be. Today she nodes maybe twice a day, as opposed to about 10 times she used to be attacked,” Odongkara says, seated under a tree his daughter used to be tied.
34. The Bank of Scotland, founded in 1695, is the oldest surviving bank in the UK. It was also the first bank in Europe to print its own bank notes.
Hello I'm back ...it's been nearly two months since my last post and I can't believe how fast the weeks have gone by. Back in May I had a pretty painful shoulder, neck and back injury and slowly with lots of treatment (plus alot of laughs at the Physio) it's getting better...I still have a couple of months to go before I'm 100% but my recovery has been going well. I was fortunate enough to have alot of class layouts and projects completed prior to my injury...and only over the past week have a been able to slowly get back into scrapping (if only for short spaces of time).
Yet, I often hear parents bragging about winning over their children in other kinds of "battles," as if it makes any more sense than it would to brag about a chess victory over a three-year-old. I see parents patting themselves and each other on the back for proving how big and strong and powerful they are. Guess what, parents? Your kids already know you are more powerful than they are. This is a lesson that does not need to be taught. Your children are frequently reminded of how powerful you are, every time you do (or refuse to do) something for them that they cannot do for themselves.
size----The magic time came for BIG BOY on June 7, he
Louisville, KY 40202
Philadelphia gave Vince Young his walking papers, and I have to be honest, I think Young is the best QB still on the market. Don’t get me wrong he looked bad last year, and I’m not suggesting a reunion. But, I do think Vince Young’s agent ought to put in a call to Oakland’s front office. The 6’5 scrambler has a big arm, making him capable of taking full advantage of Oakland’s speedy young receiving core. Young has expressed a desire to play in Texas, but I can’t see that move making a lot of sense for the Texans as T.J. Yates proved himself to be at least worthy of the back-up spot with his fill-in play late last year.
#17 1976 Bruce Frazier Fabens 440 Yards 47.8
My experiences involved saving leftovers, but forgetting to eat them or perhaps that means the same thing as avoiding them in the refrigerator… A few times I cooked meals where I had a little left over, yet not enough to save to make anything close to another meal. On one occasion I mis-measured the water to add to my Hamburger Helper meal and ended up with soup instead, which really didn’t seem like a meal I would likely reheat and eat again.
When we submit our lives to follow Jesus, the Bible says, our heart or spirit is reborn in the likeness and image of God. II Corinthians 5:17 says, “Therefore if any man be in Christ, he is a new person. The old has passed away. Behold all things have become new.” When we were born-again we received a new life, new heart, and new spirit. Your sins were erased by the blood and you are given a brand new start. As we meditate in the word and “hide it in our heart,” (Psalm 119:11) the life of God begins to transform our lives.
Most disappointing album by Sykur. Just to mention one. Sorry guys.
~ Spritz your circles with some Glimmer Mist....you can use Tattered Angels or make up your own, (I've made my own using a small spray bottle filled with a little distilled water, a few drops of alcohol ink and a pinch of Perfect Pearls (or Pearlex) mica powder). Allow them to dry. You can speed up this process by just dabbing them with a paper towel to remove excess moisture.
With those cliches and the fact that it’s a school anime, Hyouka’s already under some heavy scrutiny, but the episode gets a lot more interesting with the mysteries. We find out how clever Hotaro is through his rationalizations (and the great stunt he pulls with The Golden Web!). I have a feeling that with Eru around, Hotaro’s going to undergo a metamorphosis and shed his shell pretty soon into a real likeable character.
As for “hag,” it conjures up an unflattering image of a witchy, old woman with a wart at the end of her long, bent nose and hair that looks like something you’d use to mop the floor.
La Grande Illusion (France…Jean Renoir)
Be secure
D) Change to another religion at any given moment
Crispy, golden, fried pizza dough, salty olives and capers, ooey-gooey melty cheese, zingy tomato sauce and a bit of spinach to let you think you're eating something healthy. Each panzarotti is like a little present you get to open with your mouth. And since the recipe makes about a dozen, it's the best kind of gift - the kind you get to share with others. Thanks to Nadia G. for sharing these with us.
The two men who were attacked could easily have died or been far more seriously injured.
I think I would tell myself not to be so sensitive to what other people think and say. I would be more in touch with myself and my own feelings and self-worth. Listen to criticism, take it at face value and either accept it, use it or reject it.
Take this puppy out for a spin and see the requests for fulls (I hope!) come in!
and still found no time to use it
On the homebrewing side, I'm always amazed by the would-be brewers that want to "clone-brew" a version of Corona or even the insanely-overrated Fat Tire Ale. WTF? I just don't get it. Why get into homebrewing in the first place, if you're just going to try to copy the Shit Beers of the World? Find another hobby...cooking, maybe. You could attempt to "clone-cook" the perfect copy of a McDonalds Quarter-Pounder, or clone-bake the perfect version of a f*cking Twinkie. And then wash it all down with a Rum and Coke.
And a picture or two from the Riverwalk, which we enjoyed very much. Down along the river it is cool and green. The walk is lined with flowers and restaurants - we enjoyed our lunch at Boudrou's the best.
Miles P. was a lover of theater who staged elaborate productions of Hamlet and other works by Shakespeare. He was dedicated to education, opening the first school in the colony where one of his wives taught under willow trees.
. . . he doesn't walk. he runs. always. on a mission. and usually up to no good. he is going-going-going from wake-up to naptime. and then he crashes. and then he's going-and-going-and-going until bedtime. which only mommy can do. because he only wants his mommy. and he will scream bloody murder if he does not have his mommy. "mamamamamamamamama!"
None of this, of course, is going to affect Jeremy Hunt, the man who bravely defied World Opinion by clearing the way for Fox News owner and big-time Tory supporter Rupert Murdoch to take over BSkyB – and thus challenge the hated BBC. For Hunt just keeps on giving his smiley, pop-eyed opinion that Murdoch will have to hive off Sky News….and that’ll be OK then, won’t it?
In other words, the IBO may have been too conservative.
Reading Magazines Backwards
Back to reality today. My car broke down on the way to the store and had to be towed
21 Moondog (Louis Hardin) - This Student of Life
At the end, over wine and hors d’oeuvres, we shared stories and memories, in an abbreviated but intense shiva. Some of the books Barbara had made and some of her book collection were available for purchase, the proceeds going to the scholarship fund her children are establishing.
Get it? It propagates.
Second an apology to all my reader for not posting sooner. I had to make a trip down to North Carolina and have been rather exhausted since. More emotionally the physically. We took a weekend camping and now I'm feeling loads better. Its amazing what a little peace and quiet will do for you.
Organic makeup is becoming more widely available and
For now, the first single is interesting, the cover is very pretty, and the other hints about the album are intriguing. I look forward to hearing the rest of it. (Hint, hint.)
The wind whispered to him, “Why are you so sad Chandrim?”
Mrs. Murphy’s eyes turn to steel. “My Bill never acted out, not once. He was a good boy, and he’s a good man, and I don’t know how he raised such a child.” Her lungs protest her vehemence. “No sir, the only explanation is that the devil’s got a hold on him. The next time Bill brings him here, you have your crucifix and holy water ready, you hear me?”
The oil and cheese festival was in the Piazza del Republica and we sampled about fifteen different kinds of olive oil and just as many cheeses! It was so delicious! We caught the end of it at about 9 p.m. so we didn’t spend too much time there.
PCW Women’s Tag Team Champions Merchants of Death: Angel Scott and Angel Casey (R) vs. TBA
These days my favorite work phrase is "frame fucking".
More Ploggings asap!!
Armageddon.
♥ them!
I love you best explains how I feel for youâ€¦
I'd like to think I'm not the only one. Surely, people who have lived through that loss, were having a moment of silent reflection?
What one tends to get in economics, financial services and fiscal management is first of all some distant rumblings and the odd cloud on an otherwise azure horizon. Then there are signposts, followed soon afterwards by noises off, and bigger clouds gradually covering up the sun which was going to shine forever. Soon thereafter come articles about a wake-up call, and then the signposts become signs. Finally, there is a stage where those using binoculars in the helicopter can see that the horizon is, in fact, a huge cliff-face leading straight to Dante’s inferno below.
WWW.ULTIMATEPETRESORT.COM
Husband thing got most of the stuff that we would use at the motel moved before I woke up – except the cats, my puter, and meds. Just after I woke up, he took the cats, a load of clothes, and other misc stuff over, while I drank my coffee, caught up on Facebook, and then started to dismantle my puter/pack up meds. (stupid PA has me on enough now for 10 people. Am hoping that I can get those pared down a bit when we change docs after we end up…. wherever.)
The Malibu Inn
“Clifford, Jeff and I started Palms a little over a year ago out of a desire to continue making music together after ISIS ended,” explained Harris. “Chino joined shortly after and our sound took shape from there. We’ve worked really hard on this first release and are excited for people to hear it. It’s nice to be back behind the drum kit, and with this line up.”
I knew very well when I wrote my review of Bloom a few days ago that it wasn’t going to go over very well with a lot of people. I actually had a bit of a knot in my stomach as my cursor hovered over “Publish” because I knew very well the shitstorm that would ensue. And I was right – it’s still going on, though I think it’s died down some. You can go check it out yourself on my book blog if things like this yank your chain. Or maybe you’ve already been over there and have seen the hoopla, in which case a lot of what I’m about to say here will be redundant.
The business analyst must be able to analyze and develop our business requirements , process, and goals.
That's certainly the entirety of what I tasted here. Alcoholic ginger beer.
And let us proclaim the mystery of the faith: Christ has died, Christ has risen, Christ will come again.
"I mean, can you imagine," my Dad continued, "Ninety miles on a donkey right now? Do you even think that's possible? Ninety miles!"
and I love this photo...MAKES you SMILE.
Sara
It was a bit short but it was all worth it. I can personally say that no matter how long the travel time is, once you laid your eyes on this place, you will all forget that and I promised to come back over and over and over again. =)
The bonds were given deliberate mistakes so that if anyone tried to cash them, they could be seen as fraudulent.
About the card:
Foundation Sponge
I'm so tired. And bone-weary. My brain fog hasn't lifted yet. And I promised myself I wouldn't whine.
Ephesians 5:33 “Nevertheless let each one of you in particular so love his own wife as himself, and let the wife see that she respects her husband”
Here are a few things we bet you didn’t know about agriculture in Montana:
Lightweight stroller
As evidence, I’d point to the receptions that The Omnivore’s Dilemma and Eating Animals have received within the vegetarian community. Although it’s true that Foer comes away from his research as a vegetarian, he certainly doesn’t say that eating meat is morally indefensible. He even calls his book is “an argument for another, wiser animal agriculture and more honorable omnivory” (244). If vegetarian criticism of Pollan were rooted exclusively in objections to his condoning meat eating, than we’d expect the vegetarians who were frustrated with Pollan to have similar criticisms of Foer.
Which is why I turn to music when I am sorely lacking in that department. Music has been a constant source of inspiration, passion, drive, and motivation for me. I don't know why, but it's like coffee for my creative side. When that section of my brain goes into hibernation mode, I put some soul grabbing, passion stirring, spirit lifting music on and its like a switch has been flipped. So I thought that for today I would share what has me motivated, inspired, passionate, and raring to go.
Our discussion this morning in the Rethink Church group that I lead was focused on this topic:
Wea re to sit comfortably with eyes closed whilst Kate our cardio nurse talks us through a scenario which we are to imagine.
Mthethwa was instrumental in suspending a damaging Hawks investigation into the secret fund and lifting the suspension of controversial crime intelligence head Lieutenant General Richard Mdluli.
The recruitment rules say that besides a degree in engineering, a service of eight years will be taken into consideration for promotion to the post of executive engineer. In cases of diploma engineers, the length of service should be 10 years.
Now if you are thinking of having this procedure, don't let my experience put you off. Mine was a Friday afternoon job and their minds were on the weekend.
DP used to mat the image is a RAK from B.....
As this was a potential story, trainees went downstairs to see what was happening and cover it for Bushradionews.
And let me tell you, this couple was at it again, really taking advantage of an existing pantry, and making all the right moves at maximizing the space and storage potential.
Ray Hudson and the Western Rhythmaires - Jackhammer
No one seems to know;
That great comedian Bob had plenty .
BANDIT ARMY
I menstruate but I put one of my new towels on the floor and I lay down and imagine a Nazi clinic with blond psychopathes impregnating Norwegian women and I come fast and hard.
My patients got a real kick out of my predicament. Everyone I have nagged for years now had the perfect counterpoint to my pleas to increase their activity.
Reverence for, and submission to, order is a natural response. Burke puts it this way:
But Tuesday’s post… Well, I realized today, I missed Tuesday’s post, and I don’t particularly care. I was rather apathetic yesterday, I know that. I tried working on some art and I didn’t really care enough to work on it, but I didn’t care enough to do anything else.
Cantaloupe
That would be enough to have tipped the balance for the Conservatives in four or five of the seven ridings, Graves said.
The White House also wants to hear from the Mayors about "what's happening on the ground," what has worked in their communities and what hasn't, Kass said.
That’s me about halfway through the book and there is so much that I’ve skimmed over but if you’re not hooked by now then this isn’t your kind of book. In the next chapter, The Outsider, we learn about Don Lee’s ability to mix drinks (he’s the Heston Blumenthal of cocktails), why poets peak early in their careers and where the idea for the Barbie doll came from (if you can’t wait look up Bild Lilli). Here he talks about outsiders and creativity:
Sep 07 Mountain View, CA
I couldn't help kissing her. Sometimes you just have to kiss someone. I didn't know this would happen.
That my love was born ‘midst eternity.
river stones harvested from dry riverbed
I read all my submissions personally and I can’t see this changing anytime in the future - I’d worry too much about something amazing being missed! Also, after spending over year interning and buried in slush daily, I really enjoy reading subs......you never know what you’re going to find.
Now this is me talking about regular training. I will try to give some groups the opportunity to workout in the gym as soon as we have some equipment in there.
Potato : 1 large(Boiled and Smashed)
and their heart is like a sponge....
"A mural?" - Linze
Vampire boys wasn’t that bad but it wasn’t good enough to make the bottom of the charts.
Anyway, clearly whatever medical training he got worked out for him because when he noticed I’d woken up, he put me back under. By bashing me in the head with the butt of the sword.
Last week, a lady came in with her Mom and daughter, and she picked out a few items (it was a good sale : ) And then her daughter walked right up to this--
1 combined
And stand together, yet not too near together.
These are just few of the images I was able to catch on this very special day.
"But what about nephews and nieces?" shouts one of them.
Hmm, back up there fella.
He knows I’ll jump on anything that’s coming out a chute
For months Darian and her Shaede guardian Raif have searched for the Oracle who attempted to overthrow the Shaede Nation—and kill Darian in the bargain. But now that they’ve finally found the half-crazed Oracle, for their efforts they are granted a possibility too painful for Raif to imagine, and too enticing for Darian to ignore.
Saw flowers budding gold.
I’m happy for Tavi and Antonio and the opportunities this job will provide. But, at the same time… is it November yet?
Katie very matter of factly replied, "Well, I asked Mr. AlJo if I could sit in the back and he said that I could, so I did."
First years still yet to decide where they are going to live next year need to weigh up whether they want to swim to campus or spend the rest of their lives getting there.
PTSD renders us all useless at some point.
unlived hitherto, inebriating
Sephora Gold Polish, Sephora, $9
* Lockable/swivel front wheels
“I HAVE BEEN WATCHING YOUR BACK” God whispered to my quietened soul last week, over 2 years since He had spoken those words from Isaiah. Yes, He had been MY REARGUARD. My life…that is, my soul had been left intact. The chaff had been separated from the wheat. The battle was over and I was on my way home. From now on
Some rejected the message, some wanted to hear more, and a small group was saved.
Mark 11:24 Therefore I say unto you, What things soever ye desire, when ye pray, believe that ye receive them, and ye shall have them.
“It is your heart which is your prime communication device with the universe. Your head brain is merely that which gathers information from the quantum fields, your abdominal brain focuses your feelings. It is only your heart which can fuse both of these and determine the structure of the universe around you.”
I don’t feel like I want to just sit in the day room tomorrow all afternoon trying to find something to do on my computer which takes up longer than an hour or two. So, like I say, I think I’ll take a trip down to the mall for a couple of hours, to give me something to do.
So when I had to tell my sister and parents, I struggled with how. I didn’t want to call them and shock them live. And what if they weren’t there? The buildup to call and then get voicemail would be painful. And having to do it twice to tell my sister and then my parents seemed like hell. What was I supposed to do – organize a conference call?
There are two of these men, and there ought to be only two: the one is named Christian, the other Emperor Charles.
Omega whittles Iota to whit
writing it was enough. posting it would have been senseless. sometimes, you just have to let things go...sometimes, technology really does look out for you.
- 2 tbsp warm water
For this tutorial I'm going to use the one of my grandparents.
Nothing was her safe place. If she did nothing, she would not be required to engage anyone. If she didn't engage with anyone, she wouldn't get hurt. But it wasn't enough to do nothing. There had to be a mechanism in which to cope.
Friend: Pretending to work on my paper, but really I’m just refreshing facebook.
Beyonce's "Girls Run the World." My pump me up/get me through the day song...
